nb: Valuta: Afghansk afghani (AFN); Albansk lek (ALL); Algerisk dinarer (DZD); Angolsk kwanza (AOA); Argentinsk peso (ARS); Armensk dram (AMD); Arubansk florin (AWG); Australsk dollar (AUD); Azerbaijani manat (AZN); Bahamansk dollar (BSD); Bahrainsk dinar (BHD); Bangladeshi taka (BDT); Barbadisk dollar (BBD); Hviterussisk rubel (BYN); Belizedollar (BZD); Bermudiansk dollar (BMD); Bhutansk ngultrum (BTN); Boliviansk boliviano (BOB); Bosnia-Hercegovina konvertible mark (BAM); Botswana pula (BWP); Brasiliansk real (BRL); Britisk pund (GBP); Brunei dollar (BND); Bulgarsk lev (BGN); Burundisk franc (BIF); CFP-franc (XPF); Kambodsjansk riel (KHR); Kanadisk dollar (CAD); Kappverdisk escudo (CVE); Sentralafrikansk CFA franc (XAF); Chilensk peso (CLP); Kinesisk yuan (CNY); Colombiansk peso (COP); Komorisk franc (KMF); Kongolesisk franc (CDF); Costaricansk colón (CRC); Kroatisk kuna (HRK); Kubansk peso (CUP); Tsjekkisk koruna (CZK); Dansk krone (DKK); Djiboutisk franc (DJF); Dominikansk peso (DOP); Østkaribisk dollar (XCD); Egyptisk pund (EGP); Eritreisk nakfa (ERN); Etiopisk birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fijiansk dollar (FJD); Gambisk dalasi (GMD); Georgisk lari (GEL); Ghanesisk cedi (GHS); Guatemalansk Quetzal (GTQ); Guineisk franc (GNF); Guyanesisk dollar (GYD); Haitisk gourde (HTG); Honduransk lempira (HNL); Hong Kong dollar (HKD); Ungarsk forint (HUF); Islandsk krone (ISK); Indisk rupi (INR); Indonesisk rupiah (IDR); Iranske rial (IRR); Irakisk dinar (IQD); Israelsk New Shekel (ILS); Jamaicansk dollar (JMD); Japansk yen (JPY); Jordansk dinar (JOD); Kazakhstansk tenge (KZT); Kenyansk shilling (KES); Kuwaitisk dinar (KWD); Kyrgyzstanisk Som (KGS); Laotisk Kip (LAK); Libanesisk pund (LBP); Lesotho Loti (LSL); Liberiansk dollar (LRD); Libysk dinar (LYD); Makanesisk pataca (MOP); Makedonsk denar (MKD); Malagasisk ariary (MGA); Malawiansk kwacha (MWK); Malaysisk ringgit (MYR); Maldivisk rufiyaa (MVR); Mauritansk ouguiya (MRU); Mauritisk rupi (MUR); Meksikansk peso (MXN); Moldovsk leu (MDL); Mongolsk tögrög (MNT); Marokkansk dirham (MAD); Mosambikisk metical (MZN); Myanmarsk kyat (MMK); Namibisk dollar (NAD); Nepalsk rupi (NPR); New Zealandsk dollar (NZD); Nicaraguansk córdoba (NIO); Nigeriansk naira (NGN); Norsk krone (NOK); Omansk rial (OMR); Pakistansk rupi (PKR); Panamansk balboa (PAB); Papua Ny-Guineansk kina (PGK); Paraguayansk guarani (PYG); Peruansk sol (PEN); Filippinsk peso (PHP); Polsk złoty (PLN); Qatarsk riyal (QAR); Rumensk leu (RON); Russisk rubel (RUB); Rwandisk franc (RWF); Saint Helena pund (SHP); Samoansk tālā (WST); Saudisk riyal (SAR); Serbisk dinar (RSD); Seychellisk rupi (SCR); Sierra Leonsk leone (SLL); Singapor dollar (SGD); Salomonøyene dollar (SBD); Somalisk shilling (SOS); Sørafrikansk rand (ZAR); Sørkoreansk won (KRW); Sri Lanka rupi (LKR); Sudanesisk pund (SDG); Surinamsk dollar (SRD); Swazi lilangeni (SZL); Svensk krone (SEK); Sveitsisk franc (CHF); Syriske pund (SYP); São Tomé og Príncipe dobra (STN); Taiwansk dollar (TWD); Tajikistani somoni (TJS); Tanzaniansk shilling (TZS); Thai baht (THB); Tongansk paʻanga (TOP); Trinidad og Tobago dollar (TTD); Tunisisk dinar (TND); Tyrkisk lira (TRY); Turkmenistansk manat (TMT); Uganda shilling (UGX); Ukrainsk hryvnia (UAH); De forente arabiske emirater dirham (AED); Amerikanske dollar (USD); Uruguayansk peso (UYU); Usbekistansk som (UZS); Vanuatu vatu (VUV); Venezuelansk bolívar (VEF); Vietnamesisk đồng (VND); Vestafrikansk CFA franc (XAF); Jemenittisk rial (YER); Zambisk kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwe dollar (ZWL); Annen
hu: Pénznem: Afgán afgáni (AFN); Albán lek (ALL); Algériai dínár (DZD); Angolai kwanza (AOA); Argentin peso (ARS); Örmény dram (AMD); Arubai florin (AWG); Ausztrál dollár (AUD); Azeri manat (AZN); Bahamai dollár (BSD); Bahreini dinár (BHD); Bangladesi taka (BDT); Barbadosi dollár (BBD); Belarusz rubel (BYN); Belize-i dollár (BZD); Bermudai dollár (BMD); Bhutáni ngultrum (BTN); Bolíviai boliviano (BOB); Bosnyák konvertibilis márka (BAM); Botswanai pula (BWP); Brazil real (BRL); Angol font (GBP); Brunei dollár (BND); Bolgár leva (BGN); Burundi frank (BIF); Csendes-óceáni valutaközösségi frank (XPF); Kambodzsai riel (KHR); Kanadai dollár (CAD); Zöld-foki escudo (CVE); Közép-afrikai valutaközösségi frank (XAF); Chilei peso (CLP); Kínai jüan (CNY); Kolumbiai peso (COP); Comore-i frank (KMF); Kongói frank (CDF); Costa Rica-i colón (CRC); Horvát kuna (HRK); Kubai peso (CUP); Cseh korona (CZK); Dán korona (DKK); Dzsibuti frank (DJF); Dominikai peso (DOP); Kelet-karibi dollár (XCD); Egyiptomi font (EGP); Eritreai nakfa (ERN); Etióp birr (ETB); Euró (EUR); Fidzsi dollár (FJD); Gambiai dalasi (GMD); Grúz lari (GEL); Ghánai cedi (GHS); Guatemalai quetzal (GTQ); Guineai frank (GNF); Guyanai dollár (GYD); Haiti gourde (HTG); Hondurasi lempira (HNL); Hongkongi dollár (HKD); Magyar forint (HUF); Izlandi korona (ISK); Indiai rúpia (INR); Indonéz rúpia (IDR); Iráni riál (IRR); Iraki dinár (IQD); Izraeli új sékel (ILS); Jamaicai dollár (JMD); Japán jen (JPY); Jordán dinár (JOD); Kazak tenge (KZT); Kenyai shilling (KES); Kuvaiti dinár (KWD); Kirgiz szom (KGS); Laoszi kip (LAK); Libanoni font (LBP); Lesothói loti (LSL); Libériai dollár (LRD); Líbiai dinár (LYD); Makaói pataca (MOP); Macedón dénár (MKD); Madagaszkári ariary (MGA); Malawi kwacha (MWK); Maláj ringgit (MYR); Maldív-szigeteki rúfia (MVR); Mauritániai ouguiya (MRU); Mauritiusi rúpia (MUR); Mexikói peso (MXN); Moldáv lej (MDL); Mongol tugrik (MNT); Marokkói dirham (MAD); Mozambiki metical (MZN); Mianmari kjap (MMK); Namíbiai dollár (NAD); Nepáli rúpia (NPR); Új-zélandi dollár (NZD); Nicaraguai córdoba (NIO); Nigériai naira (NGN); Norvég korona (NOK); Ománi riál (OMR); Pakisztáni rúpia (PKR); Panamai balboa (PAB); Pápua új-guineai kina (PGK); Paraguayi guaraní (PYG); Perui sol (PEN); Fülöp-szigeteki peso (PHP); Lengyel zloły (PLN); Katari riál (QAR); Román lej (RON); Orosz rubel (RUB); Ruandai frank (RWF); Szent-Ilonai font (SHP); Szamoai tala (WST); Szaúdi riál (SAR); Szerb dinár (RSD); Seychelle-i rúpia (SCR); Sierra Leone-i leone (SLL); Szingapúri dollár (SGD); Salamon-szigeteki dollár (SBD); Szomáliai shilling (SOS); Dél-afrikai rand (ZAR); Dél-koreai won (KRW); Srí Lanka-i rúpia (LKR); Szudáni font (SDG); Suriname-i dollár (SRD); Szváziföldi lilangeni (SZL); Svéd korona (SEK); Svájci frank (CHF); Szír font (SYP); São Tomé és Príncipe-i dobra (STN); Tajvani új dollár (TWD); Tádzsik szomoni (TJS); Tanzániai shilling (TZS); Thai bát (THB); Tongai paʻanga (TOP); Trinidad és Tobagó-i dollár (TTD); Tunéziai dinár (TND); Török líra (TRY); Türkmén manat (TMT); Ugandai shilling (UGX); Ukrán hrivnya (UAH); Emirátusi dirham (AED); Amerikai dollár (USD); Uruguayi peso (UYU); Üzbég szom (UZS); Vanuatui vatu (VUV); Venezuelai bolívar (VEF); Vietnámi đồng (VND); Nyugat-afrikai valutaközösségi frank (XOF); Jemeni riál (YER); Zambiai kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwei dollár (ZWL); Egyéb
de: Währung: Afghanische Afghani (AFN); Albanischer Lek (ALL); Algerischer Dinar (DZD); Angolanischer Kwanza (AOA); Argentinischer Peso (ARS); Armenischer Dram (AMD); Aruba-Florin (AWG); Australischer Dollar (AUD); Aserbaidschan-Manat (AZN); Bahama-Dollar (BSD); Bahrain-Dinar (BHD); Bangladesch-Taka (BDT); Barbadisch-Dollar (BBD); Weißrussischer Rubel (BYN); Belize-Dollar (BZD); Bermuda-Dollar (BMD); Bhutanischer Ngultrum (BTN); Bolivianischer Boliviano (BOB); Bosnische konvertible Mark (BAM); Botswanischer Pula (BWP); Brasilianischer Real (BRL); Britisches Pfund Sterling (GBP); Brunei-Dollar (BND); Bulgarischer Lew (BGN); Burundi-Franc (BIF); CFP-Franc (XPF); Kambodschanischer Riel (KHR); Kanadischer Dollar (CAD); Kap-Verde-Escudo (CVE); Zentralafrikanischer CFA-Franc (XAF); Chilenischer Peso (CLP); Chinesischer Yuan (CNY); Kolumbianischer Peso (COP); Komoren-Franc (KMF); Kongo-Franc (CDF); Costa-Rica-Colón (CRC); Kroatische Kuna (HRK); Kubanischer Peso (CUP); Tschechische Krone (CZK); Dänische Krone (DKK); Dschibuti-Franc (DJF); Dominikanischer Peso (DOP); Ostkaribischer Dollar (XCD); Ägyptisches Pfund (EGP); Eritreischer Nakfa (ERN); Äthiopischer Birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fidschi-Dollar (FJD); Gambischer Dalasi (GMD); Georgischer Lari (GEL); Ghana-Cedi (GHS); Guatemaltekischer Quetzal (GTQ); Franc Guinéen (GNF); Guyana-Dollar (GYD); Haitianische Gourde (HTG); Honduranischer Lempira (HNL); Hongkong-Dollar (HKD); Ungarischer Forint (HUF); Isländische Krone (ISK); Indische Rupie (INR); Indonesische Rupiah (IDR); Iranischer Rial (IRR); Irakischer Dinar (IQD); Israelischer Neuer Schekel (ILS); Jamaika-Dollar (JMD); Japanischer Yen (JPY); Jordanischer Dinar (JOD); Kasachischer Tenge (KZT); Kenia-Schilling (KES); Kuwait-Dinar (KWD); Kirgisischer Som (KGS); Laotischer Kip (LAK); Libanesisches Pfund (LBP); Lesothischer Loti (LSL); Liberianischer Dollar (LRD); Libyscher Dinar (LYD); Macau-Pataca (MOP); Mazedonischer Denar (MKD); Madagaskar-Ariary (MGA); Malawi-Kwacha (MWK); Malaysischer Ringgit (MYR); Malediven-Rufiyaa (MVR); Mauretanischer Ouguiya (MRU); Mauritius-Rupie (MUR); Mexikanischer Peso (MXN); Moldauischer Leu (MDL); Mongolischer Tögrög (MNT); Marokkanischer Dirham (MAD); Mosambik-Metical (MZN); Myanmar-Kyat (MMK); Namibia-Dollar (NAD); Nepalesische Rupie (NPR); Neuseeland-Dollar (NZD); Nicaraguanischer Córdoba Oro (NIO); Nigerianischer Naira (NGN); Norwegische Krone (NOK); Omanischer Rial (OMR); Pakistanische Rupie (PKR); Panamaischer Balboa (PAB); Papua-Neuguinea-Kina (PGK); Paraguayischer Guarani (PYG); Peruanischer Sol (PEN); Philippinischer Peso (PHP); Polnischer Złoty (PLN); Katar-Riyal (QAR); Rumänischer Leu (RON); Russischer Rubel (RUB); Ruanda-Franc (RWF); St.-Helena-Pfund (SHP); Samoanische Tālā (WST); Saudi-Riyal (SAR); Serbischer Dinar (RSD); Seychellen-Rupie (SCR); Sierra-leonischer Leone (SLL); Singapur-Dollar (SGD); Salomonen-Dollar (SBD); Somalia-Schilling (SOS); Südafrikanischer Rand (ZAR); Südkoreanischer Won (KRW); Sri-Lanka-Rupie (LKR); Sudanesisches Pfund (SDG); Suriname-Dollar (SRD); Swasiland-Lilangeni (SZL); Schwedische Krone (SEK); Schweizer Franken (CHF); Syrisches Pfund (SYP); São-toméischer Dobra (STN); Taiwan-Dollar (TWD); Tadschikischer Somoni (TJS); Tansania-Schilling (TZS); Thailändischer Baht (THB); Tonga-Paʻanga (TOP); Trinidad-und-Tobago-Dollar (TTD); Tunesischer Dinar (TND); Türkische Lira (TRY); Turkmenistan-Manat (TMT); Uganda-Schilling (UGX); Ukrainische Hrywnja (UAH); VAE-Dirham (AED); US-Dollar (USD); Uruguayischer Peso (UYU); Usbekischer Som (UZS); Vanuatu-Vatu (VUV); Venezolanischer Bolívar (VEF); Vietnamesischer đồng (VND); CFA-Franc (XOF); Jemen-Rial (YER); Sambischer Kwacha (ZMW); Simbabwe-Dollar (ZWL); Sonstiges
sv: Valuta: Afghan afghani (AFN); Albansk lek (ALLA); Algerisk dinar (DZD); Angolan kwanza (AOA); Argentinsk peso (ARS); Armeniska dram (AMD); Aruban florin (AWG); Australiska dollar (AUD); Azerbajdzjanska manat (AZN); Bahamansk dollar (BSD); Bahraini dinar (BHD); Bangladeshi taka (BDT); Barbadisk dollar (BBD); Vitryska rubel (BYN); Belize dollar (BZD); Bermudisk dollar (BMD); Bhutanesiska ngultrum (BTN); Bolivian boliviano (BOB); Bosnien och Hercegovina konvertibel mark (BAM); Botswana pula (BWP); Brasilianska real (BRL); Brittiska pund (GBP); Brunei dollar (BND); Bulgariska lev (BGN); Burundisk franc (BIF); CFP franc (XPF); Kambodjanska riel (KHR); Kanadensisk dollar (CAD); Kap Verdean escudo (CVE); Central African CFA franc (XAF); Chilensk peso (CLP); Kinesiska yuan (CNY); Colombiansk peso (COP); Komorisk franc (KMF); Kongolesisk franc (CDF); Costa Rican colón (CRC); Kroatiska kuna (HRK); Kubansk peso (CUP); Czech koruna (CZK); Danska kronor (DKK); Djiboutisk franc (DJF); Dominikanska peso (DOP); Östkaribisk dollar (XCD); Egyptiskt pund (EGP); Eritrean nakfa (ERN); Etiopisk birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fijiansk dollar (FJD); Gambian dalasi (GMD); Georgisk lari (GEL); Ghanas cedi (GHS); Guatemalas quetzal (GTQ); Guinea franc (GNF); Guyana dollar (GYD); Haitisk gourde (HTG); Honduran lempira (HNL); Hong Kong dollar (HKD); Ungersk forint (HUF); Isländska kronor (ISK); Indiska rupier (INR); Indonesiska rupiah (IDR); Iranska rial (IRR); Iraqi dinar (IQD); Ny israelisk shekel (ILS); Jamaicansk dollar (JMD); Japanska yen (JPY); Jordanian dinar (JOD); Kazakhstani tenge (KZT); Kenyansk shilling (KES); Kuwaiti dinar (KWD); Kirgizistan som (KGS); Lao kip (LAK); Libanesiskt pund (LBP); Lesotho loti (LSL); Liberiansk dollar (LRD); Libyen dinar (LYD); Macanese pataca (MOP); Makedonska denarer (MKD); Malagasy ariary (MGA); Malawian kwacha (MWK); Malaysiska ringgit (MYR); Maldivian rufiyaa (MVR); Mauretansk ouguiya (MRU); Mauritius rupee (MUR); Mexikansk peso (MXN); Moldavisk leu (MDL); Mongoliska tögrög (MNT); Marockansk dirham (MAD); Mocambican metical (MZN); Myanmar kyat (MMK); Namibisk dollar (NAD); Nepalesiska rupier (NPR); Nyzeeländsk dollar (NZD); Nicaraguan córdoba (NIO); Nigerianska naira (NGN); Norska kronor (NOK); Omani rial (OMR); Pakistanska rupier (PKR); Panamas balboa (PAB); Papua Nya Guinea kina (PGK); Paraguayan guarani (PYG); Peruansk sol (PEN); Filippinsk peso (PHP); Polska złoty (PLN); Qatari riyal (QAR); Rumänska leu (RON); Rysk rubel (RUB); Rwandan franc (RWF); Saint Helena pund (SHP); Samoan tālā (WST); Saudi riyal (SAR); Serbisk dinar (RSD); Seychellisk rupie (SCR); Sierra Leonean leone (SLL); Singapore dollar (SGD); Salomonöarnas dollar (SBD); Somalisk shilling (SOS); Sydafrikansk rand (ZAR); Sydkoreanska won (KRW); Sri Lanka rupee (LKR); Sudanesiskt pund (SDG); Surinam dollar (SRD); Swazi lilangeni (SZL); Svenska kronor (SEK); Schweiziska franc (CHF); Syriskt pund (SYP); São Tomé and Príncipe dobra (STN); Taiwanesiska dollar (TWD); Tajikistani somoni (TJS); Tanzanisk shilling (TZS); Thailändska baht (THB); Tongan paʻanga (TOPP); Trinidad och Tobago dollar (TTD); Tunisisk dinar (TND); Turkisk lira (TRY); Turkmenistani manat (TMT); Ugandan shilling (UGX); Ukrainsk hryvnia (UAH); Förenade Arabemiratens dirham (AED); Amerikanska dollar (USD); Uruguayansk peso (UYU); Uzbekistansk som (UZS); Vanuatu vatu (VUV); Venezuelan bolívar (VEF); Vietnamesisk đồng (VND); Central African CFA franc (XAF); Jemenitiska rial (YER); Zambian kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwean dollar (ZWL); Annat
th: สกุลเงิน: อัฟกานีอัฟกานิสถาน (AFN); เลกแอลเบเนีย (ALL); ดีนาร์แอลจีเรีย (DZD); กวานซาแองโกลา (AOA); เปโซอาร์เจนตินา (ARS); แดรมอาร์เมเนีย (AMD); ฟลอรินอารูบา (AWG); ดอลลาร์ออสเตรเลีย (AUD); มานัตอาเซอร์ไบจาน (AZN); ดอลลาร์บาฮามาส (BSD); ดีนาร์บาห์เรน (BHD); ตากาบังคลาเทศ (BDT); ดอลลาร์บาร์เบโดส (BBD); รูเบิลเบลารุส (BYN); ดอลลาร์เบลีซ (BZD); ดอลลาร์เบอร์มิวดา (BMD); งุลตรัมภูฏาน (BTN); โบลิเวียโนโบลิเวีย (BOB); คอนเวอร์ทิเบิลมาร์คบอสเนียและเฮอร์เซโกวีนา (BAM); ปูลาบอตสวานา (BWP); เรียลบราซิล (BRL); ปอนด์สเตอร์ลิงอังกฤษ (GBP); ดอลลาร์บรูไน (BND); เลฟบัลแกเรีย (BGN); ฟรังก์บุรุนดี (BIF); ฟรังก์ CFP (XPF); เรียลกัมพูชา (KHR); ดอลลาร์แคนาดา (CAD); เอสคูโดเคปเวิร์ด (CVE); ฟรังก์ CFA แอฟริกากลาง (XAF); เปโซชิลี (CLP); หยวนจีน (CNY); เปโซโคลอมเบีย (COP); ฟรังก์คอโมโรส (KMF); ฟรังก์คองโก (CDF); โคลอนคอสตาริกา (CRC); คูนาโครเอเชีย (HRK); เปโซคิวบา (CUP); โครูนาเช็ก (CZK); โครนเดนมาร์ก (DKK); ฟรังก์จิบูตี (DJF); เปโซโดมินิกัน (DOP); ดอลลาร์แคริบเบียนตะวันออก (XCD); ปอนด์อียิปต์ (EGP); แนกฟาอิริเทรีย (ERN); เบอร์เอธิโอเปีย (ETB); ยูโร (EUR); ดอลลาร์ฟิจิ (FJD); ดาลาซีแกมเบีย (GMD); ลารีจอร์เจีย (GEL); เซดีกานา (GHS); เกตซัลกัวเตมาลา (GTQ); ฟรังก์กินี (GNF); ดอลลาร์กายอานา (GYD); กูร์ดเฮติ (HTG); เลมปิราฮอนดูรัส (HNL); ดอลลาร์ฮ่องกง (HKD); โฟรินต์ฮังการี (HUF); โครนาไอซ์แลนด์ (ISK); รูปีอินเดีย (INR); รูเปียห์อินโดนีเซีย (IDR); เรียลอิหร่าน (IRR); ดีนาร์อิรัก (IQD); นิวเชเกลอิสราเอล (ILS); ดอลลาร์จาเมกา (JMD); เยนญี่ปุ่น (JPY); ดีนาร์จอร์แดน (JOD); เทงเจคาซัคสถาน (KZT); ชิลลิงเคนยา (KES); ดีนาร์คูเวต (KWD); ซอมคีร์กีซสถาน (KGS); กีบลาว (LAK); ปอนด์เลบานอน (LBP); โลตีเลโซโท (LSL); ดอลลาร์ไลบีเรีย (LRD); ดีนาร์ลิเบีย (LYD); ปาตากามาเก๊า (MOP); ดีนาร์มาซิโดเนีย (MKD); อาเรียรีมาดากัสการ์ (MGA); ควาชามาลาวี (MWK); ริงกิตมาเลเซีย (MYR); รูฟิยามัลดีฟส์ (MVR); อูกียามอริเตเนีย (MRU); รูปีมอริเชียส (MUR); เปโซเม็กซิโก (MXN); ลิวมอลโดวา (MDL); ทูกริกมองโกเลีย (MNT); ดีแรห์มโมร็อกโก (MAD); เมติคัลโมซัมบิก (MZN); จ๊าดพม่า (MMK); ดอลลาร์นามิเบีย (NAD); รูปีเนปาล (NPR); ดอลลาร์นิวซีแลนด์ (NZD); คอร์โดบานิคารากัว (NIO); ไนราไนจีเรีย (NGN); โครนนอร์เวย์ (NOK); เรียลโอมาน (OMR); รูปีปากีสถาน (PKR); บัลบัวปานามา (PAB); กีนาปาปัวนิวกินี (PGK); กวารานีปารากวัย (PYG); ซัลเปรู (PEN); เปโซฟิลิปปินส์ (PHP); ซวอตีโปแลนด์ (PLN); ริยัลกาตาร์ (QAR); ลิวโรมาเนีย (RON); รูเบิลรัสเซีย (RUB); ฟรังก์รวันดา (RWF); ปอนด์เซนต์เฮเลนา (SHP); ทาลาซามัว (WST); ริยัลซาอุดีอาระเบีย (SAR); ดีนาร์เซอร์เบีย (RSD); รูปีเซเชลส์ (SCR); ลีโอนเซียร์ราลีโอน (SLL); ดอลลาร์สิงคโปร์ (SGD); ดอลลาร์หมู่เกาะโซโลมอน (SBD); ชิลลิงโซมาเลีย (SOS); แรนด์แอฟริกาใต้ (ZAR); วอนเกาหลีใต้ (KRW); รูปีศรีลังกา (LKR); ปอนด์ซูดาน (SDG); ดอลลาร์ซูรินาม (SRD); ลิลังเจนีสวาซิแลนด์ (SZL); โครนาสวีเดน (SEK); ฟรังก์สวิส (CHF); ปอนด์ซีเรีย (SYP); ดอบราเซาตูเมและปรินซิปี (STN); ดอลลาร์ไต้หวัน (TWD); โซโมนีทาจิกิสถาน (TJS); ชิลลิงแทนซาเนีย (TZS); บาทไทย (THB); ปาอางาตองกา (TOP); ดอลลาร์ตรินิแดดและโตเบโก (TTD); ดีนาร์ตูนิเซีย (TND); ลีราตุรกี (TRY); มานัตเติร์กเมนิสถาน (TMT); ชิลลิงยูกันดา (UGX); ฮริฟเนียยูเครน (UAH); ดีแรห์มสหรัฐอาหรับเอมิเรตส์ (AED); ดอลลาร์สหรัฐ (USD); เปโซอุรุกวัย (UYU); ซอมอุซเบกิสถาน (UZS); วาตูวานูอาตู (VUV); โบลิวาร์เวเนซุเอลา (VEF); ดองเวียดนาม (VND); ฟรังก์ CFA แอฟริกาตะวันตก (XOF); เรียลเยเมน (YER); ควาชาแซมเบีย (ZMW); ดอลลาร์ซิมบับเว (ZWL); อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Mena: Afganský afghani (AFN); Albánsky lek (ALL); Alžírsky dinár (DZD); Angolská kwanza (AOA); Argentínske peso (ARS); Arménsky dram (AMD); Aruban florin (AWG); Austrálsky dolár (AUD); Azerbajdžanský manat (AZN); Bahamský dolár (BSD); Bahrajnský dinár (BHD); Bangladéšska taka (BDT); Barbadoský dolár (BBD); Bieloruský rubeľ (BYN); Belizský dolár (BZD); Bermudský dolár (BMD); Bhutánsky ngultrum (BTN); Bolívijské boliviano (BOB); Konvertibilná marka Bosny a Hercegoviny (BAM); Botswanská pula (BWP); Brazílsky real (BRL); Britská libra šterlingov (GBP); Brunejský dolár (BND); Bulharský lev (BGN); Burundský frank (BIF); CFP frank (XPF); Kambodžský riel (KHR); Kanadský dolár (CAD); Kapverdské escudo (CVE); Stredoafrický CFA frank (XAF); Čílske peso (CLP); Čínsky jüan (CNY); Kolumbijské peso (COP); Komorský frank (KMF); Konžský frank (CDF); Kostarický colón (CRC); Chorvátska kuna (HRK); Kubánske peso (CUP); Česká koruna (CZK); Dánska koruna (DKK); Džibutský frank (DJF); Dominikánske peso (DOP); Východokaribský dolár (XCD); Egyptská libra (EGP); Eritrejská nakfa (ERN); Etiópsky birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fidžijský dolár (FJD); Gambijský dalasi (GMD); Gruzínske lari (GEL); Ghanský cedi (GHS); Guatemalský quetzal (GTQ); Guinejský frank (GNF); Guyanský dolár (GYD); Haitský gourde (HTG); Honduraská lempira (HNL); Hongkonský dolár (HKD); Maďarský forint (HUF); Islandská koruna (ISK); Indická rupia (INR); Indonézska rupia (IDR); Iránsky rial (IRR); Iracký dinár (IQD); Izraelský nový šekel (ILS); Jamajský dolár (JMD); Japonský jen (JPY); Jordánsky dinár (JOD); Kazašské tenge (KZT); Kenský šiling (KES); Kuvajtský dinár (KWD); Kirgizský som (KGS); Laoský kip (LAK); Libanonská libra (LBP); Lesotský loti (LSL); Libérijský dolár (LRD); Líbyjský dinár (LYD); Macajská pataca (MOP); Macedónsky denár (MKD); Malgašský ariary (MGA); Malawijská kwacha (MWK); Malajzijský ringgit (MYR); Maledivská rupia (MVR); Mauritánska ouguiya (MRU); Maurícijská rupia (MUR); Mexické peso (MXN); Moldavský lei (MDL); Mongolský tugrik (MNT); Marocký dirham (MAD); Mozambický metikal (MZN); Mjanmarský kyat (MMK); Namíbijský dolár (NAD); Nepálska rupia (NPR); Novozélandský dolár (NZD); Nikaragujská córdoba (NIO); Nigérijská naira (NGN); Nórska koruna (NOK); Ománsky rial (OMR); Pakistanská rupia (PKR); Panamská balboa (PAB); Papuánská kina (PGK); Paraguajský guaraní (PYG); Peruánsky sol (PEN); Filipínske peso (PHP); Poľský zlotý (PLN); Katarský rijál (QAR); Rumunský lei (RON); Ruský rubeľ (RUB); Rwandský frank (RWF); Svätohelenská libra (SHP); Samojská tala (WST); Saudský rijál (SAR); Srbský dinár (RSD); Seychelská rupia (SCR); Sierraleonský leone (SLL); Singapurský dolár (SGD); dolár Šalamúnových ostrovov (SBD); Somálsky šiling (SOS); Juhoafrický rand (ZAR); Juhokórejský won (KRW); Srílanská rupia (LKR); Sudánska libra (SDG); Surinamský dolár (SRD); Svazijský lilangeni (SZL); Švédska koruna (SEK); Švajčiarsky frank (CHF); Sýrska libra (SYP); Svätotomášska dobra (STN); Taiwanský dolár (TWD); Tadžický somoni (TJS); Tanzánsky šiling (TZS); Thajský baht (THB); Tonžská paʻanga (TOP); dolár Trinidadu a Tobaga (TTD); Tuniský dinár (TND); Turecká líra (TRY); Turkménsky manat (TMT); Ugandský šiling (UGX); Ukrajinská hrivna (UAH); dirham Spojených arabských emirátov (AED); Americký dolár (USD); Uruguajské peso (UYU); Uzbecký som (UZS); Vanuatský vatu (VUV); Venezuelský bolívar (VEF); Vietnamský dong (VND); Západoafrický frank CFA (XOF); Jemenský rial (YER); Zambijská kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwiansky dolár (ZWL); Iné
sl-SI: Valuta: Afganistanski afgani (AFN); Albanski lek (ALL); Alžirski dinar (DZD); Angolska kvanza (AOA); Argentinski peso (ARS); Armenski dram (AMD); Arubski florin (AWG); Avstralski dolar (AUD); Azerbajdžanski manat (AZN); Bahamski dolar (BSD); Bahrajnski dinar (BHD); Bangladeška taka (BDT); Barbadoški dolar (BBD); Beloruski rubelj (BYN); Belizejski dolar (BZD); Bermudski dolar (BMD); Butanski ngultrum (BTN); Bolivijski boliviano (BOB); Bosansko-hercegovska konvertibilna marka (BAM); Bocvanska pula (BWP); Brazilski real (BRL); Britanski funt šterling (GBP); Brunejski dolar (BND); Bulgarski lev (BGN); Burundijski frank (BIF); CFP frank (XPF); Kamboški riel (KHR); Kanadski dolar (CAD); Zelenortski eskudo (CVE); Srednjeafriški frank CFA (XAF); Čilski peso (CLP); Kitajski juan (CNY); Kolumbijski peso (COP); Komorski frank (KMF); Kongoški frank (CDF); Kostariški kolon (CRC); Hrvaška kuna (HRK); Kubanski peso (CUP); Češka krona (CZK); Danska krona (DKK); Džibutijski frank (DJF); Dominikanski peso (DOP); Zzhodnokaribski dolar (XCD); Egiptovski funt (EGP); Eritrejska nakfa (ERN); Etiopski bir (ETB); Evro (EUR); Fidžijski dolar (FJD); Gambijski dalasi (GMD); Gruzijski lari (GEL); Ganski cedi (GHS); Gvatemalski quetzal (GTQ); Gvinejski frank (GNF); Gvajanski dolar (GYD); Haitski gurd (HTG); Hondurska lempira (HNL); Hongkonški dolar (HKD); Madžarski forint (HUF); Islandska krona (ISK); Indijska rupija (INR); Indonezijska rupija (IDR); Iranski rial (IRR); Iraški dinar (IQD); Israelski novi šekel (ILS); Jamajški dolar (JMD); Japonski jen (JPY); Jordanski dinar (JOD); Kazahstanski tenge (KZT); Kenijski šiling (KES); Kuvajtski dinar (KWD); Kirgizistanski som (KGS); Laoški kip (LAK); Libanonski funt (LBP); Lesotski loti (LSL); Liberijski dolar (LRD); Libijski dinar (LYD); Makanska pataka (MOP); Makedonski denar (MKD); Malgaški ariarij (MGA); Malavijska kvača (MWK); Malezijski ringit (MYR); Maldivska rufija (MVR); Mavretanska uguija (MRU); Mavricijska rupija (MUR); Mehiški peso (MXN); Moldavski lev (MDL); Mongolski tugrik (MNT); Maroški dirham (MAD); Mozambiški metikal (MZN); Mjanmarski kjat (MMK); Namibijski dolar (NAD); Nepalska rupija (NPR); Novozelandski dolar (NZD); Nikaragvska kordova (NIO); Nigerijska naira (NGN); Norveška krona (NOK); Omanski rial (OMR); Pakistanska rupija (PKR); Panamska balboa (PAB); Papuansko-novogvinejska kina (PGK); Paragvajski gvarani (PYG); Perujski sol (PEN); Filipinski peso (PHP); Poljski zlot (PLN); Katarski rial (QAR); Romunski lev (RON); Ruski rubelj (RUB); Ruandski frank (RWF); Funt Svete Helene (SHP); Samoanska tala (WST); Savdski rial (SAR); Srbski dinar (RSD); Sejšelska rupija (SCR); Sierraleonski leone (SLL); Singapurski dolar (SGD); Dolar Salomonovih otokov (SBD); Somalski šiling (SOS); Južnoafriški rand (ZAR); Južnokorejski von (KRW); Šrilanška rupija (LKR); Sudanski funt (SDG); Surinamski dolar (SRD); Svazijski lilangeni (SZL); Švedska krona (SEK); Švicarski frank (CHF); Sirski funt (SYP); Dobra Sao Tomeja in Principa (STN); Tajvanski dolar (TWD); Tadžikistanski somoni (TJS); Tanzanijski šiling (TZS); Tajski baht (THB); Tonganska paanga (VRH); Dolar Trinidada in Tobaga (TTD); Tunizijski dinar (TND); Turška lira (TRY); Turkmenistanski manat (TMT); Ugandski šiling (UGX); Ukrajinska hrivnija (UAH); Dirham Združenih arabskih emiratov (AED); Ameriški dolar (USD); Urugvajski peso (UYU); Uzbekistanski som (UZS); Vanuatujski vatu (VUV); Venezuelski bolivar (VEF); Vietnamski dong (VND); Zahodnoafriški frank CFA (XOF); Jemenski rial (YER); Zambijska kvača (ZMW); Zimbabvejski dolar (ZWL); Drugo
zh-TW: 幣別: 阿富汗尼 (AFN); 阿爾巴尼亞列克 (ALL); 阿爾及利亞第納爾 (DZD); 安哥拉寬扎 (AOA); 阿根廷比索 (ARS); 亞美尼亞德拉姆 (AMD); 阿魯巴弗羅林 (AWG); 澳幣 (AUD); 阿塞拜疆馬納特 (AZN); 巴哈馬元 (BSD); 巴林第納爾 (BHD); 孟加拉國塔卡 (BDT); 巴貝多元 (BBD); 白俄羅斯盧布 (BYN); 貝里斯元 (BZD); 百慕達元 (BMD); 不丹努爾特魯姆 (BTN); 玻利維亞幣 (BOB); 波士尼亞與赫塞哥維納可兌換馬克 (BAM); 波札那普拉 (BWP); 巴西雷亞爾 (BRL); 英鎊 (GBP); 汶萊元 (BND); 保加利亞列弗 (BGN); 布隆迪法郎 (BIF); 太平洋金融共同體法郎 (XPF); 柬埔寨瑞爾 (KHR); 加元 (CAD); 佛得角埃斯庫多 (CVE); 中非金融合作法郎 (XAF); 智利比索 (CLP); 人民幣 (CNY); 哥倫比亞比索 (COP); 科摩羅法郎 (KMF); 剛果法郎 (CDF); 哥斯大黎加科朗 (CRC); 克羅埃西亞庫納 (HRK); 古巴比索 (CUP); 捷克克朗 (CZK); 丹麥克朗 (DKK); 吉布地法郎 (DJF); 多明尼加比索 (DOP); 東加勒比元 (XCD); 埃及鎊 (EGP); 厄立特里亞納克法 (ERN); 埃塞俄比亞比爾 (ETB); 歐元 (EUR); 斐濟元 (FJD); 甘比亞達拉西 (GMD); 喬治亞拉里 (GEL); 加納塞地 (GHS); 危地馬拉格查爾 (GTQ); 幾內亞法郎 (GNF); 圭亞那元 (GYD); 海地古德 (HTG); 宏都拉斯倫皮拉 (HNL); 港幣 (HKD); 匈牙利福林 (HUF); 冰島克朗 (ISK); 印度盧比 (INR); 印尼盾 (IDR); 伊朗裡亞爾 (IRR); 伊拉克第納爾 (IQD); 以色列新謝克爾 (ILS); 牙買加元 (JMD); 日元 (JPY); 約旦第納爾 (JOD); 哈薩克堅戈 (KZT); 肯亞先令 (KES); 科威特第納爾 (KWD); 吉爾吉斯索姆 (KGS); 寮國基普 (LAK); 黎巴嫩鎊 (LBP); 萊索托洛蒂 (LSL); 利比里亞元 (LRD); 利比亞第納爾 (LYD); 澳門幣 (MOP); 馬其頓代納爾 (MKD); 馬達加斯加阿里亞裡 (MGA); 馬拉維克瓦查 (MWK); 馬來西亞林吉特 (MYR); 馬爾地夫拉菲亞 (MVR); 茅利塔尼亞烏吉亞 (MRU); 毛里求斯盧比 (MUR); 墨西哥比索 (MXN); 摩爾多瓦列伊 (MDL); 蒙古圖格羅格 (MNT); 摩洛哥迪拉姆 (MAD); 莫三比克梅蒂卡爾 (MZN); 緬甸緬元 (MMK); 納米比亞元 (NAD); 尼泊爾盧比 (NPR); 紐西蘭元 (NZD); 尼加拉瓜科爾多瓦 (NIO); 尼日利亞奈拉 (NGN); 挪威克朗 (NOK); 阿曼裡亞爾 (OMR); 巴基斯坦盧比 (PKR); 巴拿馬巴爾博亞 (PAB); 巴布亞紐幾內亞 (PYG); 巴拉圭瓜拉尼 (PYG); 秘魯索爾 (PEN); 菲律賓比索 (PHP); 波蘭茲羅提 (PLN); 卡達裡亞爾 (QAR); 羅馬尼亞列伊 (RON); 俄羅斯盧布 (RUB); 盧安達法郎 (RWF); 聖赫勒拿鎊 (SHP); 薩摩亞塔拉 (WST); 沙烏地裡亞爾 (SAR); 塞爾維亞第納爾 (RSD); 塞席爾盧比 (SCR); 塞拉利昂利昂 (SLL); 新加坡元 (SGD); 所羅門群島元 (SBD); 索馬利亞先令 (SOS); 南非蘭特 (ZAR); 韓元 (KRW); 斯里蘭卡盧比 (LKR); 蘇丹鎊 (SDG); 蘇利南元 (SRD); 史瓦濟蘭裡蘭吉尼 (SZL); Swedish Krona (SEK); 瑞士法郎 (CHF); 敘利亞鎊 (SYP); 聖多美和普林西比多布拉 (STN); 新台幣 (TWD); 塔吉克索莫尼 (TJS); 坦尚尼亞先令 (TZS); 泰銖 (THB); 東加潘加 (TOP); 千里達及托巴哥 (TTD); 突尼斯第納爾 (TND); 土耳其里拉 (TRY); 土庫曼馬納特 (TMT); 烏幹達先令 (UGX); 烏克蘭格里夫納 (UAH); 阿拉伯聯合大公國; 美元 (USD); 烏拉圭比索 (UYU); 烏茲別克索姆 (UZS); 萬那杜瓦圖 (VUV); 委內瑞拉玻利瓦爾 (VEF); 越南盾 (VND); 中非金融合作法郎 (XAF); 也門裡亞爾 (YER); 贊比亞克瓦查 (ZMW); 辛巴威元 (ZWL); 其他
lt-LT: Valiuta: Afganistano afganis (AFN); Albanijos lekas (ALL); Alžyro dinaras (DZD); Angolos kvanza (AOA); Argentinos pesas (ARS); Armėnijos dramas (AMD); Arubos guldenas (AWG); Australijos doleris (AUD); Azerbaidžano manatas (AZN); Bahamų doleris (BSD); Bahreino dinaras (BHD); Bangladešo taka (BDT); Barbadoso doleris (BBD); Baltarusijos rublis (BYN); Belizo doleris (BZD); Bermudų doleris (BMD); Butano ngultrumas (BTN); Bolivijos bolivijanas (BOB); Bosnijos ir Hercegovinos konvertuojamoji markė (BAM); Botsvanos pula (BWP); Brazilijos realas (BRL); Didžiosios Britanijos svaras sterlingų (GBP); Brunėjaus doleris (BND); Bulgarijos levas (BGN); Burundžio frankas (BIF); CFP frankas (XPF); Kambodžos rielis (KHR); Kanados doleris (CAD); Žaliojo Kyšulio eskudas (CVE); Centrinės Afrikos CFA frankas (XAF); Čilės pesas (CLP); Kinijos juanis (CNY); Kolumbijos pesas (COP); Komoro frankas (KMF); Kongo frankas (CDF); Kosta Rikos kolonas (CRC); Kroatijos kuna (HRK); Kubos pesas (CUP); Čekijos krona (CZK); Danijos krona (DKK); Džibučio frankas (DJF); Dominikos pesas (DOP); Rytų Karibų doleris (XCD); Egipto svaras (EGP); Eritrėjos nakfa (ERN); Etiopijos biras (ETB); Euras (EUR); Fidžio doleris (FJD); Gambijos dalasis (GMD); Gruzijos laris (GEL); Ganos sedis (GHS); Gvatemalos ketcalis (GTQ); Gvinėjos frankas (GNF); Gajanos doleris (GYD); Haičio gurdas (HTG); Hondūro lempira (HNL); Honkongo doleris (HKD); Vengrijos forintas (HUF); Islandijos krona (ISK); Indijos rupija (INR); Indonezijos rupija (IDR); Irano rialas (IRR); Irako dinaras (IQD); Izraelio naujasis šekelis (ILS); Jamaikos doleris (JMD); Japonijos jena (JPY); Jordanijos dinaras (JOD); Kazachstano tengė (KZT); Kenijos šilingas (KES); Kuveito dinaras (KWD); Kirgizijos somas (KGS); Laoso kipas (LAK); Libano svaras (LBP); Lesoto lotis (LSL); Liberijos doleris (LRD); Libijos dinaras (LYD); Makao pataka (MOP); Makedonijos denaras (MKD); Madagaskaro ariaris (MGA); Malavio kvača (MWK); Malaizijos ringitas (MYR); Maldyvų rufija (MVR); Mauritanijos ugija (MRU); Mauricijaus rupija (MUR); Meksikos pesas (MXN); Moldovos lėja (MDL); Mongolijos tugrikas (MNT); Maroko dirhamas (MAD); Mozambiko metikalis (MZN); Mianmaro kijatas (MMK); Namibijos doleris (NAD); Nepalo rupija (NPR); Naujosios Zelandijos doleris (NZD); Nikaragvos kordoba (NIO); Nigerijos naira (NGN); Norvegijos krona (NOK); Omano rialas (OMR); Pakistano rupija (PKR); Panamos balboja (PAB); Papua Naujosios Gvinėjos kina (PGK); Paragvajaus gvaranis (PYG); Peru solis (PEN); Filipinų pesas (PHP); Lenkijos zlotas (PLN); Kataro rialas (QAR); Rumunijos lėja (RON); Rusijos rublis (RUB); Ruandos frankas (RWF); Šv. Elenos salų svaras (SHP); Samoa tala (WST); Saudo Arabijos rialas (SAR); Serbijos dinaras (RSD); Seišelių rupija (SCR); Siera Leonės leonė (SLL); Singapūro doleris (SGD); Saliamono salų doleris (SBD); Somalio šilingas (SOS); Pietų Afrikos randas (ZAR); Pietų Korėjos vonas (KRW); Šri Lankos rupija (LKR); Sudano svaras (SDG); Surinamo doleris (SRD); Svazilando lilangenis (SZL); Švedijos krona (SEK); Šveicarijos frankas (CHF); Sirijos svaras (SYP); San Tomė ir Prinsipės dobra (STN); Taivano doleris (TWD); Tadžikistano somonis (TJS); Tanzanijos šilingas (TZS); Tailando batas (THB); Tongos paanga (TOP); Trinidado ir Tobago doleris (TTD); Tuniso dinaras (TND); Turkijos lira (TRY); Turkmėnistano manatas (TMT); Ugandos šilingas (UGX); Ukrainos grivina (UAH); Jungtinių Arabų Emyratų dirhamas (AED); JAV doleris (USD); Urugvajaus pesas (UYU); Uzbekistano sumas (UZS); Vanuatu vatas (VUV); Venesuelos bolivaras (VEF); Vietnamo dongas (VND); Vakarų Afrikos CFA frankas (XAF); Jemeno rialas (YER); Zambijos kvača (ZMW); Zimbabvės doleris (ZWL); Kita
vi: Đơn vị tiền tệ: Afghani Afghanistan (AFN); Lek Albania (ALL); Dinar Algeria (DZD); Kwanza Angola (AOA); Peso Argentina (ARS); Dram Armenia (AMD); Florin Aruba (AWG); Đô la Úc (AUD); Manat Azerbaijan (AZN); Đô la Bahamas (BSD); Dinar Bahrain (BHD); Taka Bangladesh (BDT); Đô la Barbados (BBD); Rúp Belarus (BYN); Đô la Belize (BZD); Đô la Bermuda (BMD); Ngultrum Bhutan (BTN); Boliviano Bolivia (BOB); Mark Bosnia và Herzegovina có thể chuyển đổi (BAM); Pula Botswana (BWP); Real Brazil (BRL); Bảng Anh (GBP); Đô la Brunei (BND); Lev Bungaria (BGN); Franc Burundi (BIF); Franc CFP (XPF); Riel Campuchia (KHR); Đô la Canada (CAD); Escudo Cape Verde (CVE); Franc CFA Trung Phi (XAF); Peso Chile (CLP); Nhân dân tệ Trung Quốc (CNY); Peso Colombia (COP); Franc Comoros (KMF); Franc Congo (CDF); Colón Costa Rica (CRC); Kuna Croatia (HRK); Peso Cuba (CUP); Koruna Séc (CZK); Krone Đan Mạch (DKK); Franc Djibouti (DJF); Peso Dominica (DOP); Đô la Đông Caribe (XCD); Bảng Ai Cập (EGP); Nakfa Eritrea (ERN); Birr Ethiopia (ETB); Euro (EUR); Đô la Fiji (FJD); Dalasi Gambia (GMD); Lari Georgia (GEL); Cedi Ghana (GHS); Quetzal Guatemala (GTQ); Franc Guinea (GNF); Đô la Guyana (GYD); Gourde Haiti (HTG); Lempira Honduras (HNL); Đô la Hồng Kông (HKD); Forint Hungary (HUF); Króna Iceland (ISK); Rupee Ấn Độ (INR); Rupiah Indonesia (IDR); Rial Iran (IRR); Dinar Iraq (IQD); Shekel Israel mới (ILS); Đô la Jamaica (JMD); Yên Nhật (JPY); Dinar Jordan (JOD); Tenge Kazakhstan (KZT); Shilling Kenya (KES); Dinar Kuwait (KWD); Som Kyrgyzstan (KGS); Kip Lào (LAK); Bảng Li-băng (LBP); Loti Lesotho (LSL); Đô la Liberia (LRD); Dinar Libya (LYD); Pataca Ma Cao (MOP); Denar Macedonia (MKD); Ariary Madagasca (MGA); Kwacha Malawi (MWK); Ringgit Malaysia (MYR); Rufiyaa Maldives (MVR); Ouguiya Mauritania (MRU); Rupee Mauritius (MUR); Peso Mexico (MXN); Leu Moldova (MDL); Tögrög Mông Cổ (MNT); Dirham Ma-rốc (MAD); Metical Mozambique (MZN); Kyat Myanmar (MMK); Đô la Namibia (NAD); Rupee Nepal (NPR); Đô la New Zealand (NZD); Córdoba Nicaragua (NIO); Naira Nigeria (NGN); Krone Na Uy (NOK); Rial Oman (OMR); Rupee Pakistan (PKR); Balboa Panama (PAB); Kina Papua New Guinea (PGK); Guarani Paraguay (PYG); Sol Peru (PEN); Peso Philippines (PHP); Złoty Ba Lan (PLN); Riyal Qatar (QAR); Leu Romania (RON); Rúp Nga (RUB); Franc Rwanda (RWF); Bảng Saint Helena (SHP); Tālā Samoa (WST); Riyal Ả Rập Xê-út (SAR); Dinar Serbia (RSD); Rupee Seychellois (SCR); Leone Sierra Leone (SLL); Đô la Singapore (SGD); Đô la Quần đảo Solomon (SBD); Shilling Somali (SOS); Rand Nam Phi (ZAR); Won Hàn Quốc (KRW); Rupee Sri Lanka (LKR); Bảng Sudan (SDG); Đô la Suriname (SRD); Lilangeni Eswatini (SZL); Krona Thụy Điển (SEK); Franc Thụy Sĩ (CHF); Bảng Syria (SYP); Dobra São Tomé và Príncipe (STN); Đô la Đài Loan (TWD); Somoni Tajikistan (TJS); Shilling Tanzania (TZS); Baht Thái (THB); Paʻanga Tonga (TOP); Đô la Trinidad và Tobago (TTD); Dinar Tunisia (TND); Lira Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ (TRY); Manat Turkmenistan (TMT); Shilling Uganda (UGX); Hryvnia Ukraine (UAH); Dirham Các Tiểu Vương quốc Ả Rập Thống nhất (AED); Đô la Mỹ (USD); Peso Uruguay (UYU); Som Uzbekistan (UZS); Vatu Vanuatu (VUV); Bolívar Venezuela (VEF); Đồng Việt Nam (VND); Franc CFA Tây Phi (XOF); Rial Yemen (YER); Kwacha Zambia (ZMW); Đô la Zimbabwe (ZWL); Khác
cs: Měna: Afghánský afghání (AFN); Albánský lek (ALL); Alžírský dinár (DZD); Angolská kwanza (AOA); Argentinské peso (ARS); Arménský dram (AMD); Arubský zlatý (AWG); Australský dolar (AUD); Ázerbájdžánský manat (AZN); Bahamský dolar (BSD); Bahrajnský dinár (BHD); Bangladéšská taka (BDT); Barbadoský dolar (BBD); Běloruský rubl (BYN); Belizský dolar (BZD); Bermudský dolar (BMD); Bhútánský ngultrum (BTN); Bolivijský boliviano (BOB); Bosenská konvertibilní marka (BAM); Botswanská pula (BWP); Brazilský real (BRL); Britská libra (GBP); Brunejský dolar (BND); Bulharský lev (BGN); Burundský frank (BIF); CFP frank (XPF); Kambodžský riel (KHR); Kanadský dolar (CAD); Kapverdské escudo (CVE); Středoafrický CFA frank (XAF); Chilské peso (CLP); Čínský jüan (CNY); Kolumbijské peso (COP); Komorský frank (KMF); Konžský frank (CDF); Kostarický colón (CRC); Chorvatská kuna (HRK); Kubánské peso (CUP); Česká koruna (CZK); Dánská koruna (DKK); Džibutský frank (DJF); Dominikánské peso (DOP); Východokaribský dolar (XCD); Egyptská libra (EGP); Eritrejská nakfa (ERN); Etiopský birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fidžijský dolar (FJD); Gambijský dalasi (GMD); Gruzínské lari (GEL); Ghanský cedi (GHS); Guatemalský quetzal (GTQ); Guinejský frank (GNF); Guyanský dolar (GYD); Haitský gourde (HTG); Honduraská lempira (HNL); Hongkongský dolar (HKD); Maďarský forint (HUF); Islandská koruna (ISK); Indická rupie (INR); Indonéská rupie (IDR); Íránský rial (IRR); Írácký dinár (IQD); Izraelský nový šekel (ILS); Jamajský dolar (JMD); Japonský jen (JPY); Jordánský dinár (JOD); Kazašské tenge (KZT); Keňský šilink (KES); Kuvajtský dinár (KWD); Kyrgyzský som (KGS); Laoský kip (LAK); Libanonská libra (LBP); Lesothský loti (LSL); Liberijský dolar (LRD); Libyjský dinár (LYD); Macajská pataca (MOP); Makedonský denár (MKD); Malgašský ariary (MGA); Malawijská kwacha (MWK); Malajsijský ringgit (MYR); Maledivská rupie (MVR); Mauritánská ouguiya (MRU); Mauricijská rupie (MUR); Mexické peso (MXN); Moldavský leu (MDL); Mongolský tugrik (MNT); Marocký dirham (MAD); Mozambický metical (MZN); Myanmarský kyat (MMK); Namibijský dolar (NAD); Nepálská rupie (NPR); Novozélandský dolar (NZD); Nikaragujská córdoba (NIO); Nigerijská naira (NGN); Norská koruna (NOK); Ománský rial (OMR); Pákistánská rupie (PKR); Panamská balboa (PAB); Papuánská nová kina (PGK); Paraguajské guarani (PYG); Peruánský sol (PEN); Filipínské peso (PHP); Polský zlotý (PLN); Katarský rijál (QAR); Rumunský leu (RON); Ruský rubl (RUB); Rwandský frank (RWF); Svatohelenská libra (SHP); Samojská tala (WST); Saúdský rijál (SAR); Srbský dinár (RSD); Seychelská rupie (SCR); Sierro-leonský leone (SLL); Singapurský dolar (SGD); Šalamounský dolar (SBD); Somálský šilink (SOS); Jihoafrický rand (ZAR); Jihokorejský won (KRW); Srílanská rupie (LKR); Súdánská libra (SDG); Surinamský dolar (SRD); Svazijský lilangeni (SZL); Švédská koruna (SEK); Švýcarský frank (CHF); Syrská libra (SYP); Svatotomášská dobra (STN); Tchajwanský dolar (TWD); Tádžický somoni (TJS); Tanzanský šilink (TZS); Thajský baht (THB); Tonžská paanga (TOP); Trinidadsko-tobažský dolar (TTD); Tuniský dinár (TND); Turecká lira (TRY); Turkmenský manat (TMT); Ugandský šilink (UGX); Ukrajinská hřivna (UAH); Dirham Spojených arabských emirátů (AED); Americký dolar (USD); Uruguayské peso (UYU); Uzbecký som (UZS); Vanuatský vatu (VUV); Venezuelský bolívar (VEF); Vietnamský đồng (VND); Západoafrický CFA frank (XOF); Jemenský rial (YER); Zambijská kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwský dolar (ZWL); Jiné
nl: Valuta: Afghaanse afghani (AFN); Albanese lek (ALL); Algerijnse dinar (DZD); Angolese kwanza (AOA); Argentijnse peso (ARS); Armeense dram (AMD); Arubaanse florijn (AWG); Australische dollar (AUD); Azerbeidzjaanse manat (AZN); Bahamaanse dollar (BSD); Bahreinse dinar (BHD); Bengaalse taka (BDT); Barbadiaanse dollar (BBD); Wit-Russische roebel (BYN); Belizaanse dollar (BZD); Bermuda-dollar (BMD); Bhutanese ngultrum (BTN); Boliviaanse boliviano (BOB); Bosnische en Herzegovina converteerbare mark (BAM); Botswaanse pula (BWP); Braziliaanse real (BRL); Brits pond sterling (GBP); Bruneise dollar (BND); Bulgaarse lev (BGN); Burundese frank (BIF); CFP-frank (XPF); Cambodjaanse riel (KHR); Canadese dollar (CAD); Kaapverdische escudo (CVE); Centraal-Afrikaanse CFA-frank (XAF); Chileense peso (CLP); Chinese yuan (CNY); Colombiaanse peso (COP); Comorese frank (KMF); Congolese frank (CDF); Costa Ricaanse colon (CRC); Kroatische kuna (HRK); Cubaanse peso (CUP); Tsjechische kroon (CZK); Deense kroon (DKK); Djiboutiaanse frank (DJF); Dominicaanse peso (DOP); Oost-Caribische dollar (XCD); Egyptisch pond (EGP); Eritrese nakfa (ERN); Ethiopische birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fiji-dollar (FJD); Gambiaanse dalasi (GMD); Georgische lari (GEL); Ghanese cedi (GHS); Guatemalteekse quetzal (GTQ); Guineese frank (GNF); Guyaanse dollar (GYD); Haïtiaanse gourde (HTG); Hondurese lempira (HNL); Hongkongse dollar (HKD); Hongaarse forint (HUF); IJslandse kroon (ISK); Indiase roepie (INR); Indonesische roepia (IDR); Iraanse rial (IRR); Iraakse dinar (IQD); Israëlische nieuwe sjekel (ILS); Jamaicaanse dollar (JMD); Japanse yen (JPY); Jordaanse dinar (JOD); Kazachstaanse tenge (KZT); Keniaanse shilling (KES); Koeweitse dinar (KWD); Kirgizische som (KGS); Lao kip (LAK); Libanees pond (LBP); Lesotho loti (LSL); Liberiaanse dollar (LRD); Libische dinar (LYD); Macanese pataca (MOP); Macedonische denar (MKD); Malagassische ariary (MGA); Malawische kwacha (MWK); Maleisische ringgit (MYR); Maldivische Rufiyaa (MVR); Mauritaanse ouguiya (MRU); Mauritiaanse roepie (MUR); Mexicaanse peso (MXN); Moldavische leu (MDL); Mongoolse Tögrög (MNT); Marokkaanse dirham (MAD); Mozambikaanse metical (MZN); Myanmarese kyat (MMK); Namibische dollar (NAD); Nepalese roepie (NPR); Nieuw-Zeelandse dollar (NZD); Nicaraguaanse córdoba (NIO); Nigeriaanse naira (NGN); Noorse kroon (NOK); Omaanse rial (OMR); Pakistaanse roepie (PKR); Panamese balboa (PAB); Papoea-Nieuw-Guinese kina (PGK); Paraguayaanse guarani (PYG); Peruaanse sol (PEN); Filippijnse peso (PHP); Poolse zloty (PLN); Qatarese riyal (QAR); Roemeense leu (RON); Russische roebel (RUB); Rwandese frank (RWF); Sint-Heleense pond (SHP); Samoaanse tala (WST); Saoedische riyal (SAR); Servische dinar (RSD); Seychelse roepie (SCR); Sierra Leoonse leone (SLL); Singaporese dollar (SGD); Salomonsdollar (SBD); Somalische shilling (SOS); Zuid-Afrikaanse rand (ZAR); Zuid-Koreaanse won (KRW); Sri Lankaanse roepie (LKR); Soedanees pond (SDG); Surinaamse dollar (SRD); Swazische lilangeni (SZL); Zweedse kroon (SEK); Zwitserse frank (CHF); Syrisch pond (SYP); Sao Tomé en Principe dobra (STN); Taiwanese dollar (TWD); Tadzjiekse somoni (TJS); Tanzaniaanse shilling (TZS); Thaise baht (THB); Tongaanse pa'anga (TOP); Trinidad en Tobago-dollar (TTD); Tunesische dinar (TND); Turkse lira (TRY); Turkmenistaanse manat (TMT); Oegandese shilling (UGX); Oekraïense hryvnia (UAH); Verenigde Arabische Emiraten dirham (AED); Amerikaanse dollar (USD); Uruguayaanse peso (UYU); Oezbeekse som (UZS); Vanuatu vatu (VUV); Venezolaanse Bolívar (VEF); Vietnamese đồng (VND); Centraal-Afrikaanse CFA-frank (XAF); Jemenitische rial (YER); Zambiaanse kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwaanse dollar (ZWL); Andere
da: Valuta: Afghanske afghani (AFN); Albanske lek (ALL); Algeriske dinarer (DZD); Angolanske kwanza (AOA); Argentinske peso (ARS); Armenske dram (AMD); Arubanske florin (AWG); Australske dollar (AUD); Aserbajdsjanske manat (AZN); Bahamiske dollar (BSD); Bahrainske dinar (BHD); Bangladeshiske taka (BDT); Barbadiske dollar (BBD); Hviderussiske rubel (BYN); Beliziske dollar (BZD); Bermudia dollar (BMD); Bhutanesiske ngultrum (BTN); Bolivianske boliviano (BOB); Bosnien-Hercegovina mark (BAM); Botswana pula (BWP); Brasilianske real (BRL); Britiske Pund Sterling (GBP); Brunei dollar (BND); Bulgarske lev (BGN); Burundiske franc (BIF); CFP-franc (XPF); Cambodjanske riel (KHR); Canadiske dollar (CAD); Kap Verde escudo (CVE); Centralafrikanske CFA-franc (XAF); Chilenske peso (CLP); Kinesiske yuan (CNY); Colombianske peso (COP); Comoriske franc (KMF); Congolesiske franc (CDF); Costa Rica colones (CRC); Kroatiske kuna (HRK); Cubanske peso (CUP); Tjekkiske koruna (CZK); Danske kroner (DKK); Djiboutianske franc (DJF); Dominikanske peso (DOP); Østcaribiske dollar (XCD); Egyptiske pund (EGP); Eritreanske nakfa (ERN); Etiopiske birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fiji dollar (FJD); Gambiske dalasi (GMD); Georgiske lari (GEL); Ghanesiske cedi (GHS); Guatemalanske quetzal (GTQ); Guinea franc (GNF); Guyanesiske dollar (GYD); Haitiske gourde (HTG); Honduras lempira (HNL); Hong Kong dollar (HKD); Ungarske forint (HUF); Islandske kroner (ISK); Indiske rupee (INR); Indonesiske rupiah (IDR); Iranske rial (IRR); Irakiske dinarer (IQD); Israelsk ny shekel (ILS); Jamaicanske dollar (JMD); Japanske yen (JPY); Jordanske dinarer (JOD); Kazakhstan tenge (KZT); Kenyanske shilling (KES); Kuwaitiske dinarer (KWD); Kirgisistan som (KGS); Lao kip (LAK); Libanesiske pund (LBP); Lesotho loti (LSL); Liberianske dollar (LRD); Libyske dinarer (LYD); Macanese pataca (MOP); Makedonske denarer (MKD); Malagasy ariary (MGA); Malawiske kwacha (MWK); Malaysiske ringgit (MYR); Maldiviske rufiyaa (MVR); Mauretanske ouguiya (MRU); Mauritiske rupee (MUR); Mexicanske peso (MXN); Moldoviske leu (MDL); Mongolske tögrög (MNT); Marokkanske dirham (MAD); Mozambikanske metical (MZN); Myanmar kyat (MMK); Namibiske dollar (NAD); Nepalesiske rupee (NPR); New Zealandske dollar (NZD); Nicaraguanske córdoba (NIO); Nigerianske naira (NGN); Norske kroner (NOK); Omanske rial (OMR); Pakistanske rupee (PKR); Panamas balboa (PAB); Papua Ny Guinea kina (PGK); Paraguayanske guarani (PYG); Peruanske sol (PEN); Filippinske peso (PHP); Polske złoty (PLN); Qatar riyal (QAR); Rumænske leu (RON); Russiske rubel (RUB); Rwandiske franc (RWF); Saint Helena pund (SHP); Samoan tālā (WST); Saudi riyal (SAR); Serbiske dinarer (RSD); Seychelliske rupee (SCR); Sierra Leone leone (SLL); Singapore dollar (SGD); Salomonøernes dollar (SBD); Somaliske shilling (SOS); Sydafrikanske rand (ZAR); Sydkoreanske won (KRW); Sri Lanka rupee (LKR); Sudanesiske pund (SDG); Surinamske dollar (SRD); Swazi lilangeni (SZL); Svenske kroner (SEK); Schweiziske franc (CHF); Syriske pund (SYP); São Tomé og Príncipe dobra (STN); Taiwanesiske dollar (TWD); Tadsjikistan somoni (TJS); Tanzanianske shilling (TZS); Thai baht (THB); Tonganske paʻanga (TOP); Trinidad og Tobago dollar (TTD); Tunesiske dinarer (TND); Tyrkiske lira (TRY); Turkmenistanske manat (TMT); Ugandiske shilling (UGX); Ukrainske hryvnia (UAH); De Forenede Arabiske Emirater dirham (AED); Amerikanske dollar (USD); Uruguayanske peso (UYU); Usbekistanske som (UZS); Vanuatu vatu (VUV); Venezuelanske bolívar (VEF); Vietnamesiske đồng (VND); Vestafrikanske CFA-franc (XOF); Yemenitiske rial (YER); Zambiske kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwes dollar (ZWL); Andet
zh-CN: 货币: 阿富汗尼 (AFN); 阿尔巴尼亚列克 (ALL); 阿尔及利亚第纳尔 (DZD); 安哥拉宽扎 (AOA); 阿根廷比索 (ARS); 亚美尼亚德拉姆 (AMD); 阿鲁巴弗罗林 (AWG); 澳元 (AUD); 阿塞拜疆马纳特 (AZN); 巴哈马元 (BSD); 巴林第纳尔 (BHD); 孟加拉国塔卡 (BDT); 巴巴多斯元 (BBD); 白俄罗斯卢布 (BYN); 伯利兹元 (BZD); 百慕大元 (BMD); 不丹努尔特鲁姆 (BTN); 玻利维亚币 (BOB); 波斯尼亚和黑塞哥维那可兑换马克 (BAM); 博茨瓦纳普拉 (BWP); 巴西雷亚尔 (BRL); 英镑 (GBP); 文莱元 (BND); 保加利亚列弗 (BGN); 布隆迪法郎 (BIF); 太平洋金融共同体法郎 (XPF); 柬埔寨瑞尔 (KHR); 加元 (CAD); 佛得角埃斯库多 (CVE); 中非金融合作法郎 (XAF); 智利比索 (CLP); 人民币 (CNY); 哥伦比亚比索 (COP); 科摩罗法郎 (KMF); 刚果法郎 (CDF); 哥斯达黎加科朗 (CRC); 克罗地亚库纳 (HRK); 古巴比索 (CUP); 捷克克朗 (CZK); 丹麦克朗 (DKK); 吉布提法郎 (DJF); 多米尼加比索 (DOP); 东加勒比元 (XCD); 埃及镑 (EGP); 厄立特里亚纳克法 (ERN); 埃塞俄比亚比尔 (ETB); 欧元 (EUR); 斐济元 (FJD); 冈比亚达拉西 (GMD); 格鲁吉亚拉里 (GEL); 加纳塞地 (GHS); 危地马拉格查尔 (GTQ); 几内亚法郎 (GNF); 圭亚那元 (GYD); 海地古德 (HTG); 洪都拉斯伦皮拉 (HNL); 港元 (HKD); 匈牙利福林 (HUF); 冰岛克朗 (ISK); 印度卢比 (INR); 印尼盾 (IDR); 伊朗里亚尔 (IRR); 伊拉克第纳尔 (IQD); 以色列新谢克尔 (ILS); 牙买加元 (JMD); 日元 (JPY); 约旦第纳尔 (JOD); 哈萨克斯坦坚戈 (KZT); 肯尼亚先令 (KES); 科威特第纳尔 (KWD); 吉尔吉斯斯坦索姆 (KGS); 老挝基普 (LAK); 黎巴嫩镑 (LBP); 莱索托洛蒂 (LSL); 利比里亚元 (LRD); 利比亚第纳尔 (LYD); 澳门币 (MOP); 马其顿代纳尔 (MKD); 马达加斯加阿里亚里 (MGA); 马拉维克瓦查 (MWK); 马来西亚林吉特 (MYR); 马尔代夫拉菲亚 (MVR); 毛里塔尼亚乌吉亚 (MRU); 毛里求斯卢比 (MUR); 墨西哥比索 (MXN); 摩尔多瓦列伊 (MDL); 蒙古图格罗格 (MNT); 摩洛哥迪拉姆 (MAD); 莫桑比克梅蒂卡尔 (MZN); 缅甸缅元 (MMK); 纳米比亚元 (NAD); 尼泊尔卢比 (NPR); 新西兰元 (NZD); 尼加拉瓜科尔多瓦 (NIO); 尼日利亚奈拉 (NGN); 挪威克朗 (NOK); 阿曼里亚尔 (OMR); 巴基斯坦卢比 (PKR); 巴拿马巴尔博亚 (PAB); 巴布亚新几内亚基那 (PGK); 巴拉圭瓜拉尼 (PYG); 秘鲁索尔 (PEN); 菲律宾比索 (PHP); 波兰兹罗提 (PLN); 卡塔尔里亚尔 (QAR); 罗马尼亚列伊 (RON); 俄罗斯卢布 (RUB); 卢旺达法郎 (RWF); 圣赫勒拿镑 (SHP); 萨摩亚塔拉 (WST); 沙特里亚尔 (SAR); 塞尔维亚第纳尔 (RSD); 塞席尔卢比 (SCR); 塞拉利昂利昂 (SLL); 新加坡元 (SGD); 所罗门群岛元 (SBD); 索马里先令 (SOS); 南非兰特 (ZAR); 韩元 (KRW); 斯里兰卡卢比 (LKR); 苏丹镑 (SDG); 苏里南元 (SRD); 斯威士兰里兰吉尼 (SZL); 瑞典克朗 (SEK); 瑞士法郎 (CHF); 叙利亚镑 (SYP); 圣多美和普林西比多布拉 (STN); 新台币 (TWD); 塔吉克斯坦索莫尼 (TJS); 坦桑尼亚先令 (TZS); 泰铢 (THB); 汤加潘加 (TOP); 特立尼达和多巴哥元 (TTD); 突尼斯第纳尔 (TND); 土耳其里拉 (TRY); 土库曼斯坦马纳特 (TMT); 乌干达先令 (UGX); 乌克兰格里夫纳 (UAH); 阿联酋迪拉姆 (AED); 美元 (USD); 乌拉圭比索 (UYU); 乌兹别克斯坦索姆 (UZS); 瓦努阿图瓦图 (VUV); 委内瑞拉玻利瓦尔 (VEF); 越南盾 (VND); 东非金融合作法郎 (XAF); 也门里亚尔 (YER); 赞比亚克瓦查 (ZMW); 津巴布韦元 (ZWL); 其他
fr: Devise: Afghan Afghani (AFN); Lek albanais (ALL); Dinar algérien (DZD); Angolan Kwanza (AOA); Peso argentin (ARS); Dram arménien (AMD); Florin d'Aruba (AWG); Dollar australien (AUD); Azerbaijani Manat (AZN); Dollar des Bahamas (BSD); Dinar bahreïni (BHD); Bangladeshi Taka (BDT); Dollar barbadien (BBD); Rouble biélorusse (BYN); Dollar bélizéen (BZD); Dollar bermudien (BMD); Ngultrum bhoutanais (BTN); Boliviano bolivien (BOB); Mark convertible de Bosnie-Herzégovine (BAM); Botswana Pula (BWP); Réal brésilien (BRL); Livre sterling britannique (GBP); Dollar de Brunei (BND); Lev bulgare (BGN); Franc burundais (BIF); CFP Franc (XPF); Riel cambodgien (KHR); Dollar canadien (CAD); Escudo Cap-Verdien (CVE); Franc CFA d'Afrique centrale (XAF); Peso chilien (CLP); Yuan chinois (CNY); Peso Colombien (COP); Franc comorien (KMF); Franc congolais (CDF); Costa Rican Colón (CRC); Kuna croate (HRK); Peso Cubain (CUP); Couronne tchèque (CZK); Couronne danoise (DKK); Djiboutian Franc (DJF); Peso Dominicain (DOP); Dollar des Caraïbes orientales (XCD); Livre égyptienne (EGP); Eritrean Nakfa (ERN); Birr éthiopien (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fijian Dollar (FJD); Dalasi gambien (GMD); Georgian Lari (GEL); Cédi ghanéen (GHS); Quetzal guatémaltèque (GTQ); Franc guinéen (GNF); Dollar guyanais (GYD); Gourde haïtienne (HTG); Lempira hondurien (HNL); Dollar de Hong Kong (HKD); Forint hongrois (HUF); Couronne islandaise (ISK); Roupie indienne (INR); Roupie indonésienne (IDR); Rial iranien (IRR); Dinar irakien (IQD); Nouveau Shekel israélien (ILS); Dollar jamaïcain (JMD); Yen japonais (JPY); Dinar jordanien (JOD); Kazakhstani Tenge (KZT); Shilling kenyan (KES); Dinar koweïtien (KWD); Kyrgyzstani Som (KGS); Kip laotien (LAK); Livre libanaise (LBP); Lesotho Loti (LSL); Dollar libérien (LRD); Dinar Libyen (LYD); Pataca macanaise (MOP); Denar macédonien (MKD); Ariary Malgache (MGA); Malawian Kwacha (MWK); Malaysian Ringgit (MYR); Rufiyaa maldivienne (MVR); Ouguiya mauritanienne (MRU); Roupie mauricienne (MUR); Peso mexicain (MXN); Leu moldave (MDL); Mongolian Tögrög (MNT); Moroccan Dirham (MAD); Metical mozambicain (MZN); Kyat birman (MMK); Dollar namibien (NAD); Roupie népalaise (NPR); Dollar néo-zélandais (NZD); Nicaraguan Córdoba (NIO); Nigerian Naira (NGN); Norwegian Krone (NOK); Rial d'Oman (OMR); Roupie pakistanaise (PKR); Balboa panaméen (PAB); Kina de Papouasie-Nouvelle-Guinée (PGK); Paraguayan Guarani (PYG); Sol péruvien (PEN); Peso philippin (PHP); Zloty polonais (PLN); Riyal qatari (QAR); Leu roumain (RON); Rouble russe (RUB); Rwandan Franc (RWF); Livre de Sainte-Hélène (SHP); Samoan Tālā (WST); Riyal saoudien (SAR); Dinar serbe (RSD); Roupie Seychelloise (SCR); Leone sierra-léonais (SLL); Dollar de Singapour (SGD); Dollar des Îles Salomon (SBD); Shilling somalien (SOS); Rand sud-africain (ZAR); Won sud-coréen (KRW); Roupie sri lankaise (LKR); Livre soudanaise (SDG); Dollar surinamais (SRD); Swazi Lilangeni (SZL); Swedish Krona (SEK); Franc suisse (CHF); Livre syrienne (SYP); São Tomé and Príncipe Dobra (STN); Dollar taïwanais (TWD); Tajikistani Somoni (TJS); Shilling tanzanien (TZS); Baht thaïlandais (THB); Tongan Paʻanga (TOP); Trinité-et-Tobago; Dinar tunisien (TND); Turkish Lira (TRY); Manat turkmène (TMT); Shilling ougandais (UGX); Hryvnia ukrainienne (UAH); Emirats Arabes Unis (AED); Dollar américain (USD); Peso uruguayen (UYU); Som ouzbek (UZS); Vanuatu Vatu (VUV); Venezuelan Bolívar (VEF); Dong vietnamien (VND); Franc CFA d'Afrique centrale (XAF); Rial yéménite (YER); Zambian Kwacha (ZMW); Dollar zimbabwéen (ZWL); Autre
bg-BG: Валута: Афганистански афгани (AFN); Албански лек (ALL); Алжирски динар (DZD); Анголска кванза (AOA); Аржентинско песо (ARS); Арменски драм (AMD); Арубански флорин (AWG); Австралийски долар (AUD); Азербайджански манат (AZN); Бахамски долар (BSD); Бахрейнски динар (BHD); Бангладешка така (BDT); Барбадоски долар (BBD); Беларуска рубла (BYN); Белизийски долар (BZD); Бермудски долар (BMD); Бутански нгултрум (BTN); Боливийско боливиано (BOB); Конвертибилна марка на Босна и Херцеговина (BAM); Ботсванска пула (BWP); Бразилски реал (BRL); Британска лира стерлинг (GBP); Брунейски долар (BND); Български лев (BGN); Бурундийски франк (BIF); CFP франк (XPF); Камбоджански риел (KHR); Канадски долар (CAD); Ескудо на Кабо Верде (CVE); Централноафрикански CFA франк (XAF); Чилийско песо (CLP); Китайски юан (CNY); Колумбийско песо (COP); Коморски франк (KMF); Конгоански франк (CDF); Костарикански колон (CRC); Хърватска куна (HRK); Кубинско песо (CUP); Чешка крона (CZK); Датска крона (DKK); Джибутиски франк (DJF); Доминиканско песо (DOP); Източнокарибски долар (XCD); Египетска лира (EGP); Еритрейска накфа (ERN); Етиопски бир (ETB); Евро (EUR); Фиджийски долар (FJD); Гамбийско даласи (GMD); Грузинско лари (GEL); Ганайско седи (GHS); Гватемалски кетцал (GTQ); Гвинейски франк (GNF); Гвианайски долар (GYD); Хаитянска гурда (HTG); Хондураска лемпира (HNL); Хонконгски долар (HKD); Унгарски форинт (HUF); Исландска крона (ISK); Индийска рупия (INR); Индонезийска рупия (IDR); Ирански риал (IRR); Иракски динар (IQD); Израелски нов шекел (ILS); Ямайски долар (JMD); Японска йена (JPY); Йордански динар (JOD); Казахстанско тенге (KZT); Кенийски шилинг (KES); Кувейтски динар (KWD); Киргизстански сом (KGS); Лаоски кип (LAK); Ливанска лира (LBP); Лоти на Лесото (LSL); Либерийски долар (LRD); Либийски динар (LYD); Макайска патака (MOP); Македонски денар (MKD); Мадагаскарски ариар (MGA); Малавийска квача (MWK); Малайзийски рингит (MYR); Малдивска руфия (MVR); Мавританска угуия (MRU); Мавританска рупия (MUR); Мексиканско песо (MXN); Молдовски леи (MDL); Монголски тугрик (MNT); Марокански дирхам (MAD); Мозамбикски метиал (MZN); Мианмарски киат (MMK); Намибийски долар (NAD); Непалска рупия (NPR); Новозеландски долар (NZD); Никарагуанска кордоба (NIO); Нигерийска наира (NGN); Норвежка крона (NOK); Омански риал (OMR); Пакистанска рупия (PKR); Панамска балбоа (PAB); Кина на Папуа-Нова Гвинея (PGK); Парагвайско гуарани (PYG); Перуански сол (PEN); Филипинско песо (PHP); Полски злоти (PLN); Катарски риал (QAR); Румънска лея (RON); Руска рубла (RUB); Руандийски франк (RWF); Паунд на Света Елена (SHP); Самоански талас (WST); Саудитски риал (SAR); Сръбски динар (RSD); Сейшелска рупия (SCR); Леоне на Сиера Леоне (SLL); Сингапурски долар (SGD); Долар на Соломоновите острови (SBD); Сомалийски шилинг (SOS); Южноафрикански ранд (ZAR); Южнокорейски вон (KRW); Шриланска рупия (LKR); Суданска лира (SDG); Суринамски долар (SRD); Свази лилангени (SZL); Шведска крона (SEK); Швейцарски франк (CHF); Сирийска лира (SYP); Добра на Сао Томе и Принсипи (STN); Тайвански долар (TWD); Таджикистански сомони (TJS); Танзанийски шилинг (TZS); Тайландски бат (THB); Тонганска паʻанга (TOP); Долар на Тринидад и Тобаго (TTD); Тунизийски динар (TND); Турска лира (TRY); Туркменистански манат (TMT); Угандийски шилинг (UGX); Украинска гривна (UAH); Дирхам на Обединените арабски емирства (AED); Щатски долар (USD); Уругвайско песо (UYU); Узбекистански сом (UZS); Вануатскo вату (VUV); Венецуелски bоливар (VEF); Виетнамски dong (VND); Западноафрикански CFA франк (XOF); Йеменски риал (YER); Замбийска квача (ZMW); Зимбабвийски долар (ZWL); Други
el: Νόμισμα: Αφγάνι Αφγανιστάν (AFN); Λεκ Αλβανίας (ALL); Δηνάριο Αλγερίας (DZD); Κουάνζα Αγκόλας (AOA); Πέσο Αργεντινής (ARS); Ντραμ Αρμενίας (AMD); Φλορίνι Αρούμπας (AWG); Δολάριο Αυστραλίας (AUD); Μανάτ Αζερμπαϊτζάν (AZN); Δολάριο Μπαχάμων (BSD); Δηνάριο Μπαχρέιν (BHD); Τάκα Μπαγκλαντές (BDT); Δολάριο Μπαρμπάντος (BBD); Ρούβλι Λευκορωσίας (BYN); Δολάριο Μπελίζ (BZD); Δολάριο Βερμούδων (BMD); Νγκούλτρουμ Μπουτάν (BTN); Μπολιβιάνο Βολιβίας (BOB); Μετατρέψιμο Μάρκο Βοσνίας-Ερζεγοβίνης (BAM); Πούλα Μποτσουάνας (BWP); Ρεάλ Βραζιλίας (BRL); Λίρα Στερλίνα Ηνωμένου Βασιλείου (GBP); Δολάριο Μπρουνέι (BND); Λεβ Βουλγαρίας (BGN); Φράγκο Μπουρούντι (BIF); Φράγκο CFP (XPF); Ριέλ Καμπότζης (KHR); Δολάριο Καναδά (CAD); Εσκούδο Πράσινου Ακρωτηρίου (CVE); Κεντροαφρικανικό Φράγκο CFA (XAF); Πέσο Χιλής (CLP); Γουάν Κίνας (CNY); Πέσο Κολομβίας (COP); Φράγκο Κομορών (KMF); Φράγκο Κονγκό (CDF); Κολόν Κόστα Ρίκα (CRC); Κούνα Κροατίας (HRK); Πέσο Κούβας (CUP); Κορώνα Τσεχίας (CZK); Κορώνα Δανίας (DKK); Φράγκο Τζιμπουτί (DJF); Πέσο Δομινικανής Δημοκρατίας (DOP); Δολάριο Ανατολικής Καραϊβικής (XCD); Λίρα Αιγύπτου (EGP); Νάκφα Ερυθραίας (ERN); Μπιρ Αιθιοπίας (ETB); Ευρώ (EUR); Δολάριο Φίτζι (FJD); Νταλάσι Γκάμπιας (GMD); Λάρι Γεωργίας (GEL); Σεδί Γκάνας (GHS); Κετσάλ Γουατεμάλας (GTQ); Φράγκο Γουινέας (GNF); Δολάριο Γουιάνας (GYD); Γκουρντ Αϊτής (HTG); Λεμπίρα Ονδούρας (HNL); Δολάριο Χονγκ Κονγκ (HKD); Φιορίνι Ουγγαρίας (HUF); Κορώνα Ισλανδίας (ISK); Ρουπία Ινδίας (INR); Ρουπία Ινδονησίας (IDR); Ριάλ Ιράν (IRR); Δηνάριο Ιράκ (IQD); Νέο Σέκελ Ισραήλ (ILS); Δολάριο Τζαμάικας (JMD); Γεν Ιαπωνίας (JPY); Δηνάριο Ιορδανίας (JOD); Τένγκε Καζακστάν (KZT); Σελίνι Κένυας (KES); Δηνάριο Κουβέιτ (KWD); Σομ Κιργιζίας (KGS); Κιπ Λάος (LAK); Λίρα Λιβάνου (LBP); Λότι Λεσότο (LSL); Δολάριο Λιβερίας (LRD); Δηνάριο Λιβύης (LYD); Πατάκα Μακάο (MOP); Δηνάριο Βόρειας Μακεδονίας (MKD); Αριάρι Μαδαγασκάρης (MGA); Κουάτσα Μαλάουι (MWK); Ρινγκίτ Μαλαισίας (MYR); Ρουπία Μαλδίβων (MVR); Ουγκουίγια Μαυριτανίας (MRU); Ρουπία Μαυρικίου (MUR); Πέσο Μεξικού (MXN); Λέου Μολδαβίας (MDL); Τουγκρίκ Μογγολίας (MNT); Ντιρχάμ Μαρόκου (MAD); Μετικάλ Μοζαμβίκης (MZN); Κιάτ Μιανμάρ (MMK); Δολάριο Ναμίμπιας (NAD); Ρουπία Νεπάλ (NPR); Δολάριο Νέας Ζηλανδίας (NZD); Κόρδοβα Νικαράγουας (NIO); Νάιρα Νιγηρίας (NGN); Κορώνα Νορβηγίας (NOK); Ριάλ Ομάν (OMR); Ρουπία Πακιστάν (PKR); Μπαλμπόα Παναμά (PAB); Κίνα Παπούα Νέας Γουινέας (PGK); Γκουαρανί Παραγουάης (PYG); Σολ Περού (PEN); Πέσο Φιλιππίνων (PHP); Ζλότι Πολωνίας (PLN); Ριάλ Κατάρ (QAR); Λέου Ρουμανίας (RON); Ρούβλι Ρωσίας (RUB); Φράγκο Ρουάντας (RWF); Λίρα Αγίας Ελένης (SHP); Ταλά Σαμόα (WST); Ριάλ Σαουδικής Αραβίας (SAR); Δηνάριο Σερβίας (RSD); Ρουπία Σεϋχελλών (SCR); Λεόνε Σιέρα Λεόνε (SLL); Δολάριο Σιγκαπούρης (SGD); Δολάριο Νήσων Σολομώντος (SBD); Σελίνι Σομαλίας (SOS); Ραντ Νότιας Αφρικής (ZAR); Γουόν Νότιας Κορέας (KRW); Ρουπία Σρι Λάνκα (LKR); Λίρα Σουδάν (SDG); Δολάριο Σουρινάμ (SRD); Λιλανγκένι Εσουατίνι (SZL); Κορώνα Σουηδίας (SEK); Φράγκο Ελβετίας (CHF); Λίρα Συρίας (SYP); Ντόμπρα Σάο Τομέ και Πρίνσιπε (STN); Δολάριο Ταϊβάν (TWD); Σομόνι Τατζικιστάν( TJS); Σελίνι Τανζανίας (TZS); Μπατ Ταϊλάνδης (THB); Παάνγκα Τόνγκα (TOP); Δολάριο Τρινιδάδ και Τομπάγκο (TTD); Δηνάριο Τυνησίας (TND); Λίρα Τουρκίας (TRY); Μανάτ Τουρκμενιστάν (TMT); Σελίνι Ουγκάντας (UGX); Γρίβνα Ουκρανίας (UAH); Ντιράμ Ηνωμένων Αραβικών Εμιράτων (AED); Δολάριο Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών (USD); Πέσο Ουρουγουάης (UYU); Σομ Ουζμπεκιστάν (UZS); Βάτου Βανουάτου (VUV); Μπολιβάρ Βενεζουέλας (VEF); Ντονγκ Βιετνάμ (VND); Φράγκο CFA Δυτικής Αφρικής (XOF); Ριάλ Υεμένης (YER); Κουάτσα Ζάμπιας (ZMW); Δολάριο Ζιμπάμπουε (ZWL); Άλλο
fi: Valuutta: Afganistanin afgani (AFN); Albanian lek (ALL); Algerian dinaari (DZD); Angolan kwanza (AOA); Argentiinan peso (ARS); Armenian dram (AMD); Aruban floriini (AWG); Australian dollari (AUD); Azerbaidžanin manat (AZN); Bahaman dollari (BSD); Bahrainin dinaari (BHD); Bangladeshin taka (BDT); Barbadoksen dollari (BBD); Valko-Venäjän rupla (BYN); Belizen dollari (BZD); Bermudan dollari (BMD); Bhutanin ngultrum (BTN); Bolivian boliviano (BOB); Bosnia ja Hertsegovinan vaihdettava markka (BAM); Botswanan pula (BWP); Brasilian real (BRL); Englannin punta (GBP); Brunein dollari (BND); Bulgarian leva (BGN); Burundin frangi (BIF); CFP-frangi (XPF); Kambodžan riel (KHR); Kanadan dollari (CAD); Kap Verden escudo (CVE); Keski-Afrikan CFA-frangi (XAF); Chilen peso (CLP); Kiinan juan (CNY); Kolumbian peso (COP); Komorien frangi (KMF); Kongon frangi (CDF); Costa Rican colón (CRC); Kroatian kuna (HRK); Kuuban peso (CUP); Tšekin koruna (CZK); Tanskan kruunu (DKK); Djiboutin frangi (DJF); Dominikaanisen tasavallan peso (DOP); Itä-Karibian dollari (XCD); Egyptin punta (EGP); Eritrean nakfa (ERN); Etiopian birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fidžin dollari (FJD); Gambian dalasi (GMD); Georgian lari (GEL); Ghanan cedi (GHS); Guatemalan quetzal (GTQ); Guinean frangi (GNF); Guyanan dollari (GYD); Haitin gourde (HTG); Hondurasin lempira (HNL); Hongkongin dollari (HKD); Unkarin forintti (HUF); Islannin kruunu (ISK); Intian rupia (INR); Indonesian rupia (IDR); Iranin rial (IRR); Irakin dinaari (IQD); Israelin uusi sekeli (ILS); Jamaikan dollari (JMD); Japanin jeni (JPY); Jordanian dinaari (JOD); Kazakstanin tenge (KZT); Kenian šillinki (KES); Kuwaitin dinaari (KWD); Kirgisian som (KGS); Laosin kip (LAK); Libanonin punta (LBP); Lesothon loti (LSL); Liberian dollari (LRD); Libyan dinaari (LYD); Macaon pataca (MOP); Makedonian denaari (MKD); Madagaskarin ariary (MGA); Malawin kwacha (MWK); Malesian ringgit (MYR); Malediivien rufiyaa (MVR); Mauritanian ouguiya (MRU); Mauritiuksen rupia (MUR); Meksikon peso (MXN); Moldovan leu (MDL); Mongolian tögrög (MNT); Marokon dirhami (MAD); Mosambikin metical (MZN); Myanmarin kyat (MMK); Namibian dollari (NAD); Nepalin rupia (NPR); Uuden-Seelannin dollari (NZD); Nicaraguan córdoba (NIO); Nigerian naira (NGN); Norjan kruunu (NOK); Omanin rial (OMR); Pakistanin rupia (PKR); Panaman balboa (PAB); Papua-Uusi-Guinean kina (PGK); Paraguayn guarani (PYG); Perun sol (PEN); Filippiinien peso (PHP); Puolan zloty (PLN); Qatarin rial (QAR); Romanian leu (RON); Venäjän rupla (RUB); Ruandan frangi (RWF); Saint Helenan punta (SHP); Samoan tālā (WST); Saudi-Arabian rial (SAR); Serbian dinaari (RSD); Seychellien rupia (SCR); Sierra Leonen leone (SLL); Singaporen dollari (SGD); Salomonsaarten dollari (SBD); Somalian šillinki (SOS); Etelä-Afrikan randi (ZAR); Etelä-Korean won (KRW); Sri Lankan rupia (LKR); Sudanin punta (SDG); Surinamin dollari (SRD); Swazimaan lilangeni (SZL); Ruotsin kruunu (SEK); Sveitsin frangi (CHF); Syyrian punta (SYP); São Tomé ja Príncipen dobra (STN); Taiwanin dollari (TWD); Tadžikistanin somoni (TJS); Tansanian šillinki (TZS); Thaimaan baht (THB); Tongan paʻanga (TOP); Trinidad ja Tobagon dollari (TTD); Tunisian dinaari (TND); Turkin liira (TRY); Turkmenistanin manat (TMT); Ugandan šillinki (UGX); Ukrainan hryvnia (UAH); Yhdistyneiden arabiemiirikuntien dirhami (AED); Yhdysvaltain dollari (USD); Uruguayn peso (UYU); Uzbekistanin som (UZS); Vanuatun vatu (VUV); Venezuelan bolívar (VEF); Vietnamin đồng (VND); Länsi-Afrikan CFA-frangi (XOF); Jemenin rial (YER); Sambian kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwen dollari (ZWL); Muu
pt-PT: Moeda: Afegâni afegão (AFN); Lek albanês (ALL); Dinar argelino (DZD); Kwanza angolana (AOA); Peso argentino (ARS); Dram arménio (AMD); Florim arubano (AWG); Dólar australiano (AUD); Manat azerbaijano (AZN); Dólar baamiano (BSD); Dinar baremita (BHD); Taka bangladexiana (BDT); Dólar barbadense (BBD); Rublo bielorrusso (BYN); Dólar belizense (BZD); Dólar bermudense (BMD); Ngultrum butanês (BTN); Boliviano da Bolívia (BOB); Marco convertível da Bósnia-Herzegovina (BAM); Pula botsuana (BWP); Real brasileiro (BRL); Libra esterlina britânica (GBP); Dólar bruneíno (BND); Lev búlgaro (BGN); Franco burundiano (BIF); Franco CFP (XPF); Riel cambojano (KHR); Dólar canadiano (CAD); Escudo cabo-verdiano (CVE); Franco CFA centro-africano (XAF); Peso chileno (CLP); Iuane chinês (CNY); Peso colombiano (COP); Franco comoriano (KMF); Franco congolês (CDF); Colón costa-riquenho (CRC); Kuna croata (HRK); Peso cubano (CUP); Coroa checa (CZK); Coroa dinamarquesa (DKK); Franco jibutiano (DJF); Peso dominicano (DOP); Dólar das Caraíbas Orientais (XCD); Libra egípcia (EGP); Nakfa eritreia (ERN); Birr etíope (ETB); Euro (EUR); Dólar fijiano (FJD); Dalasi gambiano (GMD); Lari georgiano (GEL); Cedi ganês (GHS); Quetzal guatemalteco (GTQ); Franco guineense (GNF); Dólar guianês (GYD); Gurde haitiano (HTG); Lempira hondurenha (HNL); Dólar de Hong Kong (HKD); Forinte húngaro (HUF); Coroa islandesa (ISK); Rupia indiana (INR); Rupia indonésia (IDR); Rial iraniano (IRR); Dinar iraquiano (IQD); Novo shekel israelita (ILS); Dólar jamaicano (JMD); Iene japonês (JPY); Dinar jordano (JOD); Tengue cazaque (KZT); Xelim queniano (KES); Dinar koweitiano (KWD); Som quirguiz (KGS); Kipe laociano (LAK); Libra libanesa (LBP); Loti lesotiano (LSL); Dólar liberiano (LRD); Dinar líbio (LYD); Pataca macaense (MOP); Denar da Macedónia do Norte (MKD); Ariari malgaxe (MGA); Kwacha malauiano (MWK); Ringgit malaio (MYR); Rupia maldiva (MVR); Ouguiya mauritana (MRU); Rupia mauriciana (MUR); Peso mexicano (MXN); Leu moldavo (MDL); Tugrik mongol (MNT); Dirame marroquino (MAD); Metical moçambicano (MZN); Kyat de Mianmar (MMK); Dólar namibiano (NAD); Rúpia nepalesa (NPR); Dólar neozelandês (NZD); Córdoba ouro nicaraguense (NIO); Naira nigeriana (NGN); Coroa norueguesa (NOK); Rial omanense (OMR); Rúpia paquistanesa (PKR); Balboa panamense (PAB); Kina papua (PGK); Guarani paraguaio (PYG); Sol peruano (PEN); Peso filipino (PHP); Zlóti polaco (PLN); Rial catariano (QAR); Leu romeno (RON); Rublo russo (RUB); Franco ruandês (RWF); Libra santa-helenense (SHP); Tala do Estado Independente de Samoa (WST); Rial saudita (SAR); Dinar sérvio (RSD); Rupia seichelense (SCR); Leone serra-leonês (SLL); Dólar singapurense (SGD); Dólar salomonense (SBD); Xelim somali (SOS); Rand sul-africano (ZAR); Won sul-coreano (KRW); Rupia cingalesa (LKR); Libra sudanesa (SDG); Dólar surinamês (SRD); Lilangeni essuatiniano (SZL); Coroa sueca (SEK); Franco suíço (CHF); Libra síria (SYP); Dobra são-tomense (STN); Novo dólar taiwanês (TWD); Somoni tajique (TJS); Xelim tanzaniano (TZS); Baht tailandês (THB); Paanga tonganesa (TOP); Dólar de Trindade e Tobago (TTD); Dinar tunisino (TND); Lira turca (TRY); Manat turquemeno (TMT); Xelim ugandês (UGX); Hryvnia ucraniana (UAH); Dirame emiradense (AED); Dólar dos Estados Unidos (USD); Peso uruguaio (UYU); Sum usbeque (UZS); Vatu vanuatuense (VUV); Bolívar venezuelano (VEF); Dong vietnamita (VND); Franco CFA da África Ocidental (XOF); Rial iemenita (YER); Kwacha zambiano (ZMW); Dólar zimbabuense (ZWL); Outro
ja: 通貨: アフガニスタンアフガニ (AFN); アルバニアレク (ALL); アルジェリアディナール (DZD); アンゴラクワンザ (AOA); アルゼンチンペソ (ARS); アルメニアドラム (AMD); アルバンフロリン (AWG); オーストラリアドル (AUD); アゼルバイジャンマナト (AZN); バハマドル (BSD); バーレーンディナール (BHD); バングラデシュタカ (BDT); バルバドスドル (BBD); ベラルーシルーブル (BYN); ベリーズドル (BZD); バミューダドル (BMD); ブータンニュルタム (BTN); ボリビアボリビアーノ (BOB); ボスニアヘルツェゴビナ兌換マルク (BAM); ボツワナプラ (BWP); ブラジルレアル (BRL); イギリススターリングポンド (GBP); ブルネイドル (BND); ブルガリアレフ (BGN); ブルンジフラン (BIF); CFPフラン (XPF); カンボジアリエル (KHR); カナダドル (CAD); カーボベルデエスクード (CVE); 中央アフリカCFAフラン (XAF); チリペソ (CLP); 中国人民元 (CNY); コロンビアペソ (COP); コモロフラン (KMF); コンゴフラン (CDF); コスタリカコロン (CRC); クロアチアクーナ (HRK); キューバペソ (CUP); チェココルナ (CZK); デンマーククローネ (DKK); ジブチフラン (DJF); ドミニカペソ (DOP); 東カリブドル (XCD); エジプトポンド (EGP); エリトリアナクファ (ERN); エチオピアブル (ETB); ユーロ (EUR); フィジードル (FJD); ガンビアダラシ (GMD); グルジアラリ (GEL); ガーナセディ (GHS); グアテマラケツァル (GTQ); ギニアフラン (GNF); ガイアナドル (GYD); ハイチグールド (HTG); ホンジュラスレンピラ (HNL); 香港ドル (HKD); ハンガリーフォリント (HUF); アイスランドクローナ (ISK); インドルピー (INR); インドネシアルピア (IDR); イランリアル (IRR); イラクディナール (IQD); イスラエル新シェケル (ILS); ジャマイカドル (JMD); 日本円 (JPY); ヨルダンディナール (JOD); カザフスタンテンゲ (KZT); ケニアシリング (KES); クウェートディナール (KWD); キルギスタンソム (KGS); ラオスキップ (LAK); レバノンポンド (LBP); レソトロティ (LSL); リベリアドル (LRD); リビアディナール (LYD); マカオパタカ (MOP); マケドニアディナール (MKD); マダガスカルアリアリ (MGA); マラウイクワチャ (MWK); マレーシアリンギット (MYR); モルディブルフィア (MVR); モーリタニアウギア (MRU); モーリシャスルピー (MUR); メキシコペソ (MXN); モルドバレウ (MDL); モンゴルトゥグルグ (MNT); モロッコディルハム (MAD); モザンビークメティカル (MZN); ミャンマーチャット (MMK); ナミビアドル (NAD); ネパールルピー (NPR); ニュージーランドドル (NZD); ニカラグアコルドバ (NIO); ナイジェリアナイラ (NGN); ノルウェークローネ (NOK); オマーンリアル (OMR); パキスタンルピー (PKR); パナマバルボア (PAB); パプアニューギニアキナ (PGK); パラグアイグアラニー (PYG); ペルーソル (PEN); フィリピンペソ (PHP); ポーランドズウォティ (PLN); カタールリヤル (QAR); ルーマニアレイ (RON); ロシアルーブル (RUB); ルワンダフラン (RWF); セントヘレナポンド (SHP); サモアタラ (WST); サウジアラビアリヤル (SAR); セルビアディナール (RSD); セーシェルルピー (SCR); シエラレオネレオーネ (SLL); シンガポールドル (SGD); ソロモン諸島ドル (SBD); ソマリアシリング (SOS); 南アフリカランド (ZAR); 韓国ウォン (KRW); スリランカルピー (LKR); スーダンポンド (SDG); スリナムドル (SRD); スワジリランゲニ (SZL); スウェーデンクローナ (SEK); スイスフラン (CHF); シリアポンド (SYP); サントメプリンシペドブラ (STN); 台湾ドル (TWD); タジキスタンソモニ (TJS); タンザニアシリング (TZS); タイバーツ (THB); トンガパアンガ (TOP); トリニダードトバゴドル (TTD); チュニジアディナール (TND); トルコリラ (TRY); トルクメニスタンマナト (TMT); ウガンダシリング (UGX); ウクライナフリヴニャ (UAH); アラブ首長国連邦ディルハム (AED); 米ドル (USD); ウルグアイペソ (UYU); ウズベキスタンソム (UZS); バヌアツバツ (VUV); ベネズエラボリバル (VEF); ベトナムドン (VND); 西アフリカCFAフラン (XAF); イエメンリアル (YER); ザンビアクワチャ (ZMW); ジンバブエドル (ZWL); その他
ru: Валюта: Афганский афгани (AFN); Албанский лек (ALL); Алжирский динар (DZD); Ангольская кванза (AOA); Аргентинское песо (ARS); Армянский драм (AMD); Арубанский флорин (AWG); Австралийский доллар (AUD); Азербайджанский манат (AZN); Багамский доллар (BSD); Бахрейнский динар (BHD); Бангладешская така (BDT); Барбадосский доллар (BBD); Белорусский рубль (BYN); Белизский доллар (BZD); Бермудский доллар (BMD); Бутанский нгултрум (BTN); Боливийский боливиано (BOB); Конвертируемая марка Боснии и Герцеговины (BAM); Ботсванская пула (BWP); Бразильский реал (BRL); Британский фунт стерлингов (GBP); Брунейский доллар (BND); Болгарский лев (BGN); Бурундийский франк (BIF); Франк КФП (XPF); Камбоджийский риель (KHR); Канадский доллар (CAD); Эскудо Кабо-Верде (CVE); Центральноафриканский франк КФА (XAF); Чилийское песо (CLP); Китайский юань (CNY); Колумбийское песо (COP); Коморский франк (KMF); Конголезский франк (CDF); Костариканский колон (CRC); Хорватская куна (HRK); Кубинское песо (CUP); Чешская крона (CZK); Датская крона (DKK); Франк Джибути (DJF); Доминиканское песо (DOP); Восточнокарибский доллар (XCD); Египетский фунт (EGP); Эритрейская накфа (ERN); Эфиопский быр (ETB); Евро (EUR); Фиджийский доллар (FJD); Гамбийский даласи (GMD); Грузинский лари (GEL); Ганский седи (GHS); Гватемальский кетцаль (GTQ); Гвинейский франк (GNF); Гайанский доллар (GYD); Гаитянский гурд (HTG); Гондурасская лемпира (HNL); Гонконгский доллар (HKD); Венгерский форинт (HUF); Исландская крона (ISK); Индийская рупия (INR); Индонезийская рупия (IDR); Иранский риал (IRR); Иракский динар (IQD); Новый израильский шекель (ILS); Ямайский доллар (JMD); Японская иена (JPY); Иорданский динар (JOD); Казахстанский тенге (KZT); Кенийский шиллинг (KES); Кувейтский динар (KWD); Кыргызский сом (KGS); Лаосский кип (LAK); Ливанский фунт (LBP); Лесотский лоти (LSL); Либерийский доллар (LRD); Ливийский динар (LYD); Патака Макао (MOP); Македонский денар (MKD); Малагасийский ариари (MGA); Малавийская квача (MWK); Малайзийский ринггит (MYR); Мальдивская руфия (MVR); Мавританская угия (MRU); Маврикийская рупия (MUR); Мексиканское песо (MXN); Молдавский лей (MDL); Монгольский тугрик (MNT); Марокканский дирхам (MAD); Мозамбикский метикал (MZN); Мьянманский кьят (MMK); Намибийский доллар (NAD); Непальская рупия (NPR); Новозеландский доллар (NZD); Никарагуанская кордоба (NIO); Нигерийская найра (NGN); Норвежская крона (NOK); Оманский риал (OMR); Пакистанская рупия (PKR); Панамский бальбоа (PAB); Кина Папуа-Новой Гвинеи (PGK); Парагвайский гуарани (PYG); Перуанский соль (PEN); Филиппинское песо (PHP); Польский злотый (PLN); Катарский риал (QAR); Румынский лей (RON); Российский рубль (RUB); Руандийский франк (RWF); Фунт Святой Елены (SHP); Самоанская тала (WST); Саудовский риял (SAR); Сербский динар (RSD); Сейшельская рупия (SCR); Леоне Сьерра-Леоне (SLL); Сингапурский доллар (SGD); Доллар Соломоновых островов (SBD); Сомалийский шиллинг (SOS); Южноафриканский рэнд (ZAR); Южнокорейская вона (KRW); Шри-ланкийская рупия (LKR); Суданский фунт (SDG); Суринамский доллар (SRD); Свазилендский лилангени (SZL); Шведская крона (SEK); Швейцарский франк (CHF); Сирийский фунт (SYP); Добра Сан-Томе и Принсипи (STN); Тайваньский доллар (TWD); Таджикский сомони (TJS); Танзанийский шиллинг (TZS); Тайский бат (THB); Тонганская паанга (TOP); Доллар Тринидада и Тобаго (TTD); Тунисский динар (TND); Турецкая лира (TRY); Туркменский манат (TMT); Угандийский шиллинг (UGX); Украинская гривна (UAH); Дирхам ОАЭ (AED); Доллар США (USD); Уругвайское песо (UYU); Узбекский сум (UZS); Вануатский вату (VUV); Венесуэльский боливар (VEF); Вьетнамский донг (VND); Франк КФА Западной Африки (XOF); Йеменский риал (YER); Замбийская квача (ZMW); Зимбабвийский доллар (ZWL); Другое
en: Currency: Afghan Afghani (AFN); Albanian Lek (ALL); Algerian Dinar (DZD); Angolan Kwanza (AOA); Argentine Peso (ARS); Armenian Dram (AMD); Aruban Florin (AWG); Australian Dollar (AUD); Azerbaijani Manat (AZN); Bahamian Dollar (BSD); Bahraini Dinar (BHD); Bangladeshi Taka (BDT); Barbadian Dollar (BBD); Belarusian Ruble (BYN); Belize Dollar (BZD); Bermudian Dollar (BMD); Bhutanese Ngultrum (BTN); Bolivian Boliviano (BOB); Bosnia and Herzegovina Convertible Mark (BAM); Botswana Pula (BWP); Brazilian Real (BRL); British Pound Sterling (GBP); Brunei Dollar (BND); Bulgarian Lev (BGN); Burundian Franc (BIF); CFP Franc (XPF); Cambodian Riel (KHR); Canadian Dollar (CAD); Cape Verdean Escudo (CVE); Central African CFA Franc (XAF); Chilean Peso (CLP); Chinese Yuan (CNY); Colombian Peso (COP); Comorian Franc (KMF); Congolese Franc (CDF); Costa Rican Colón (CRC); Croatian Kuna (HRK); Cuban Peso (CUP); Czech Koruna (CZK); Danish Krone (DKK); Djiboutian Franc (DJF); Dominican Peso (DOP); East Caribbean Dollar (XCD); Egyptian Pound (EGP); Eritrean Nakfa (ERN); Ethiopian Birr (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fijian Dollar (FJD); Gambian Dalasi (GMD); Georgian Lari (GEL); Ghanaian Cedi (GHS); Guatemalan Quetzal (GTQ); Guinean Franc (GNF); Guyanese Dollar (GYD); Haitian Gourde (HTG); Honduran Lempira (HNL); Hong Kong Dollar (HKD); Hungarian Forint (HUF); Icelandic Króna (ISK); Indian Rupee (INR); Indonesian Rupiah (IDR); Iranian Rial (IRR); Iraqi Dinar (IQD); Israeli New Shekel (ILS); Jamaican Dollar (JMD); Japanese Yen (JPY); Jordanian Dinar (JOD); Kazakhstani Tenge (KZT); Kenyan Shilling (KES); Kuwaiti Dinar (KWD); Kyrgyzstani Som (KGS); Lao Kip (LAK); Lebanese Pound (LBP); Lesotho Loti (LSL); Liberian Dollar (LRD); Libyan Dinar (LYD); Macanese Pataca (MOP); Macedonian Denar (MKD); Malagasy Ariary (MGA); Malawian Kwacha (MWK); Malaysian Ringgit (MYR); Maldivian Rufiyaa (MVR); Mauritanian Ouguiya (MRU); Mauritian Rupee (MUR); Mexican Peso (MXN); Moldovan Leu (MDL); Mongolian Tögrög (MNT); Moroccan Dirham (MAD); Mozambican Metical (MZN); Myanmar Kyat (MMK); Namibian Dollar (NAD); Nepalese Rupee (NPR); New Zealand Dollar (NZD); Nicaraguan Córdoba (NIO); Nigerian Naira (NGN); Norwegian Krone (NOK); Omani Rial (OMR); Pakistani Rupee (PKR); Panamanian Balboa (PAB); Papua New Guinean Kina (PGK); Paraguayan Guarani (PYG); Peruvian Sol (PEN); Philippine Peso (PHP); Polish Złoty (PLN); Qatari Riyal (QAR); Romanian Leu (RON); Russian Ruble (RUB); Rwandan Franc (RWF); Saint Helena Pound (SHP); Samoan Tālā (WST); Saudi Riyal (SAR); Serbian Dinar (RSD); Seychellois Rupee (SCR); Sierra Leonean Leone (SLL); Singapore Dollar (SGD); Solomon Islands Dollar (SBD); Somali Shilling (SOS); South African Rand (ZAR); South Korean Won (KRW); Sri Lankan Rupee (LKR); Sudanese Pound (SDG); Surinamese Dollar (SRD); Swazi Lilangeni (SZL); Swedish Krona (SEK); Swiss Franc (CHF); Syrian Pound (SYP); São Tomé and Príncipe Dobra (STN); Taiwanese Dollar (TWD); Tajikistani Somoni (TJS); Tanzanian Shilling (TZS); Thai Baht (THB); Tongan Paʻanga (TOP); Trinidad and Tobago Dollar (TTD); Tunisian Dinar (TND); Turkish Lira (TRY); Turkmenistani Manat (TMT); Ugandan Shilling (UGX); Ukrainian Hryvnia (UAH); United Arab Emirates Dirham (AED); United States Dollar (USD); Uruguayan Peso (UYU); Uzbekistani Som (UZS); Vanuatu Vatu (VUV); Venezuelan Bolívar (VEF); Vietnamese đồng (VND); West African CFA Franc (XOF); Yemeni Rial (YER); Zambian Kwacha (ZMW); Zimbabwean Dollar (ZWL); Other
pl: Waluta: Afghani afgański (AFN); Lek albański (WSZYSTKIE); Dinar algierski (DZD); Kwanza angolska (AOA); Peso argentyńskie (ARS); Dram ormiański (AMD); Florin arubański (AWG); Dolar australijski (AUD); Manat azerbejdżański (AZN); Dolar bahamski (BSD); Dinar bahrajski (BHD); Taka bengalska (BDT); Dolar Barbadosu (BBD); Rubel białoruski (BYN); Dolar belizeński (BZD); Dolar bermudzki (BMD); Ngultrum bhutański (BTN); Boliviano boliwijskie (BOB); Marka wymienna Bośni i Hercegowiny (BAM); Pula botswańska (BWP); Real brazylijski (BRL); Funt brytyjski (GBP); Dolar brunejski (BND); Lew bułgarski (BGN); Frank burundyjski (BIF); Frank CFP (XPF); Riel kambodżański (KHR); Dolar kanadyjski (CAD); Escudo Republiki Zielonego Przylądka (CVE); Frank środkowoafrykański CFA (XAF); Peso chilijskie (CLP); Juan chiński (CNY); Peso kolumbijskie (COP); Frank Komorów (KMF); Frank kongijski (CDF); Colon kostarykański (CRC); Kuna chorwacka (HRK); Peso kubańskie (CUP); Korona czeska (CZK); Korona duńska (DKK); Frank dżibutyjski (DJF); Peso dominikańskie (DOP); Dolar wschodniokaraibski (XCD); Funt egipski (EGP); Nakfa erytrejska (ERN); Birr etiopski (ETB); Euro (EUR); Dolar Fidżi (FJD); Dalasi gambijskie (GMD); Lari gruzińskie (GEL); Cedi ghańskie (GHS); Quetzal gwatemalski (GTQ); Frank gwinejski (GNF); Dolar gujański (GYD); Gourde haitańska (HTG); Lempira honduraska (HNL); Dolar hongkoński (HKD); Forint węgierski (HUF); Korona islandzka (ISK); Rupia indyjska (INR); Rupia indonezyjska (IDR); Rial irański (IRR); Dinar iracki (IQD); Nowy szekel izraelski (ILS); Dolar jamajski (JMD); Jen japoński (JPY); Dinar jordański (JOD); Tenge kazachskie (KZT); Szyling kenijski (KES); Dinar kuwejcki (KWD); Som Kirgiski (KGS); Kip laotański (LAK); Funt libański (LBP); Loti lesotański (LSL); Dolar liberyjski (LRD); Dinar libijski (LYD); Pataca Makau (MOP); Denar macedoński (MKD); Ariary malgaski (MGA); Kwacha malawijska (MWK); Ringgit malezyjski (MYR); Rupia malediwska (MVR); Ouguiya mauretańska (MRU); Rupia maurytyjska (MUR); Peso meksykańskie (MXN); Lej mołdawski (MDL); Tugrik mongolski (MNT); Dirham marokański (MAD); Metical mozambicki (MZN); Kiat birmański (MMK); Dolar namibijski (NAD); Rupia nepalska (NPR); Dolar nowozelandzki (NZD); Cordoba nikaraguańska (NIO); Naira nigeryjska (NGN); Korona norweska (NOK); Rial omański (OMR); Rupia pakistańska (PKR); Balboa panamski (PAB); Kina papuaska (PGK); Guarani paragwajski (PYG); Sol peruwiański (PEN); Peso filipińskie (PHP); Złoty polski (PLN); Rial katarski (QAR); Lej rumuński (RON); Rubel rosyjski (RUB); Frank rwandyjski (RWF); Funt Świętej Heleny (SHP); Tala samoańska (WST); Rial saudyjski (SAR); Dinar serbski (RSD); Rupia seszelska (SCR); Leone Sierra Leone (SLL); Dolar singapurski (SGD); Dolar Wysp Salomona (SBD); Szyling somalijski (SOS); Rand południowoafrykański (ZAR); Won południowokoreański (KRW); Rupia lankijska (LKR); Funt sudański (SDG); Dolar surinamski (SRD); Lilangeni eswatyński (SZL); Korona szwedzka (SEK); Frank szwajcarski (CHF); Funt syryjski (SYP); Dobra Wyspy Świętego Tomasza i Książęcej (STN); Dolar tajwański (TWD); Somoni tadżyckie (TJS); Szyling tanzański (TZS); Baht tajski (THB); Paʻanga tongijska (TOP); Dolar Trynidad i Tobago (TTD); Dinar tunezyjski (TND); Lira turecka (TRY); Manat turkmeński (TMT); Szyling ugandyjski (UGX); Hrywna ukraińska (UAH); Dirham Zjednoczonych Emiratów Arabskich (AED); Dolar amerykański (USD); Peso urugwajskie (UYU); Som uzbecki (UZS); Vatu vanuatańskie (VUV); Bolívar wenezuelski (VEF); Dong wietnamski (VND); Frank zachodnioafrykański CFA (XOF); Rial jemeński (YER); Kwacha zambijska (ZMW); Dolar Zimbabwe (ZWL); Pozostałe
hr-HR: Valuta: Afganistanski afgani (AFN); Albanski lek (SVI); Alžirski dinar (DZD); Angolska kvanza (AOA); Argentinski pezo (ARS); Armenski dram (AMD); Arupski florin (AWG); Australski dolar (AUD); Azerbajdžanski manat (AZN); Bahamski dolar (BSD); Bahreinski dinar (BHD); Bangladeška taka (BDT); Barbadoski dolar (BBD); Bjeloruski rubalj (BYN); Belizejski dolar (BZD); Bermudski dolar (BMD); Butanski ngultrum (BTN); Bolivijski bolivijano (BOB); Bosanskohercegovačka konvertibilna marka (BAM); Bocvanska Pula (BWP); Brazilski real (BRL); Britanska funta (GBP); Brunejski dolar (BND); Bugarski lev (BGN); Burundski franak (BIF); CFP franak (XPF); Kambodžanski rijal (KHR); Kanadski dolar (CAD); Zelenortski eskudo (CVE); Srednjoafrički CFA franak (XAF); Čileanski pezo (CLP); Kineski juan (CNY); Kolumbijski pezo (COP); Komorski franak (KMF); Kongoanski franak (CDF); Kostarikanski kolon (CRC); Hrvatska kuna (HRK); Kubanski pezo (CUP); Češka kruna (CZK); Danska kruna (DKK); Džibutski franak (DJF); Dominikanski pezo (DOP); Istočnokaripski dolar (XCD); Egipatska funta (EGP); Eritrejska nakfa (ERN); Etiopski bir (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fidžijski dolar (FJD); Gambijski dalasi (GMD); Gruzijski lari (GEL); Ganski cedi (GHS); Gvatemalski kvecal (GTQ); Gvinejski franak (GNF); Gvajanski dolar (GYD); Haićanski gourd (HTG); Honduraška lempira (HNL); Hongkonški dolar (HKD); Mađarska forinta (HUF); Islandska kruna (ISK); Indijska rupija (INR); Indonezijska rupija (IDR); Iranski rijal (IRR); Irački dinar (IQD); Izraelski novi šekel (ILS); Jamajčanski dolar (JMD); Japanski jen (JPY); Jordanski dinar (JOD); Kazahstanski tenge (KZT); Kenijski šiling (KES); Kuvajtski dinar (KWD); Kirgistanski som (KGS); Laoski kip (LAK); Libanonska funta (LBP); Lesotski loti (LSL); Liberijski dolar (LRD); Libijski dinar (LYD); Makaoška pataka (MOP); Makedonski denar (MKD); Malgaški arijari (MGA); Malavijska kvača (MWK); Malezijski ringit (MYR); Maldivska rufija (MVR); Mauritanska ouguija (MRU); Mauricijska rupija (MUR); Meksički pezo (MXN); Moldavski lej (MDL); Mongolski tugrik (MNT); Marokanski dirham (MAD); Mozambički metikal (MZN); Mjanmarski kjat (MMK); Namibijski dolar (NAD); Nepalska rupija (NPR); Novozelandski dolar (NZD); Nikaragvanska kordoba (NIO); Nigerijska naira (NGN); Norveška kruna (NOK); Omanski rijal (OMR); Pakistanska rupija (PKR); Panamska balboa (PAB); Papuanska kina (PGK); Paragvajski guarani (PYG); Peruanski sol (PEN); Filipinski pezo (PHP); Poljski zloti (PLN); Katarski rijal (QAR); Rumunjski lej (RON); Ruski rubalj (RUB); Ruandski franak (RWF); Svetohelenska funta (SHP); Samoanska tala (WST); Saudijski rijal (SAR); Srpski dinar (RSD); Sejšelska rupija (SCR); Sijeraleonski leone (SLL); Singapurski dolar (SGD); Solomonskootočni dolar (SBD); Somalski šiling (SOS); Južnoafrički rand (ZAR); Južnokorejski von (KRW); Šrilankanska rupija (LKR); Sudanska funta (SDG); Surinamski dolar (SRD); Svazi lilangeni (SZL); Švedska kruna (SEK); Švicarski franak (CHF); Sirijska funta (SYP); Svetotomska dobra (STN); Tajvanski dolar (TWD); Tadžikistanski somoni (TJS); Tanzanijski šiling (TZS); Tajlandski baht (THB); Tongaška pa’anga (TOP); Trinidadtobaški dolar (TTD); Tuniski dinar (TND); Turska lira (TRY); Turkmenistanski manat (TMT); Ugandski šiling (UGX); Ukrajinska hrivnja (UAH); UAE dirham (AED); Američki dolar (USD); Urugvajski pezo (UYU); Uzbekistanski som (UZS); Vanuatski vatu (VUV); Venezuelanski bolivar (VEF); Vijetnamski dong (VND); Zapadnoafrički CFA franak (XOF); Jemenski rijal (YER); Zambijska kvača (ZMW); Zimbabveanski dolar (ZWL); Ostalo
tr: Para Birimi: Afgan Afganisi (AFN); Arnavutluk Leki (ALL); Cezayir Dinarı (DZD); Angola Kwanzası (AOA); Arjantin Pezosu (ARS); Ermenistan Dramı (AMD); Aruba Florini (AWG); Avustralya Doları (AUD); Azerbaycan Manatı (AZN); Bahama Doları (BSD); Bahreyn Dinarı (BHD); Bangladeş Takası (BDT); Barbados Doları (BBD); Belarus Rublesi (BYN); Belize Doları (BZD); Bermuda Doları (BMD); Bhutan Ngultrumu (BTN); Bolivya Bolivyanosu (BOB); Bosna Hersek Konvertibl Markı (BAM); Botsvana Pulası (BWP); Brezilya Reali (BRL); İngiliz Sterlini (GBP); Brunei Doları (BND); Bulgar Levası (BGN); Burundi Frangı (BIF); CFP Frangı (XPF); Kamboçya Rieli (KHR); Kanada Doları (CAD); Yeşil Burun Adaları Esküdosu (CVE); Orta Afrika CFA Frangı (XAF); Şili Pezosu (CLP); Çin Yuanı (CNY); Kolombiya Pezosu (COP); Komor Frangı (KMF); Kongo Frangı (CDF); Kosta Rika Kolonu (CRC); Hırvatistan Kunası (HRK); Küba Pezosu (CUP); Çek Korunası (CZK); Danimarka Kronu (DKK); Cibuti Frangı (DJF); Dominik Pezosu (DOP); Doğu Karayip Doları (XCD); Mısır Lirası (EGP); Eritre Nakfası (ERN); Etiyopya Birri (ETB); Euro (EUR); Fiji Doları (FJD); Gambiya Dalasisi (GMD); Gürcistan Larisi (GEL); Ganalı Cedisi (GHS); Guatemala Quetzalı (GTQ); Gine Frangı (GNF); Guyana Doları (GYD); Haiti Gourdesi (HTG); Honduras Lempirası (HNL); Hong Kong Doları (HKD); Macar Forinti (HUF); İzlanda Kronu (ISK); Hindistan Rupisi (INR); Endonezya Rupisi (IDR); İran Riyali (IRR); Irak Dinarı (IQD); İsrail Yeni Şekeli (ILS); Jamaika Doları (JMD); Japon Yeni (JPY); Ürdün Dinarı (JOD); Kazakistan Tengesi (KZT); Kenya Şilini (KES); Kuveyt Dinarı (KWD); Kırgızistan Somu (KGS); Laos Kipi (LAK); Lübnan Lirası (LBP); Lesoto Lotisi (LSL); Liberya Doları (LRD); Libya Dinarı (LYD); Makao Patakası (MOP); Makedonya Dinarı (MKD); Madagaskar Ariarisi (MGA); Malavi Kvaçası (MWK); Malezya Ringgiti (MYR); Maldiv Rufiyası (MVR); Moritanya Ugiyası (MRU); Mauritius Rupisi (MUR); Meksika Pezosu (MXN); Moldova Leyi (MDL); Moğolistan Tugriki (MNT); Fas Dirhemi (MAD); Mozambik Metikali (MZN); Myanmar Kyatı (MMK); Namibya Doları (NAD); Nepal Rupisi (NPR); Yeni Zelanda Doları (NZD); Nikaragua Kordobası (NIO); Nijerya Nairası (NGN); Norveç Kronu (NOK); Umman Riyali (OMR); Pakistan Rupisi (PKR); Panama Balboası (PAB); Papua Yeni Gine Kinası (PGK); Paraguay Guaranísi (PYG); Peru Solü (PEN); Filipin Pezosu (PHP); Polonya Zlotisi (PLN); Katar Riyali (QAR); Romanya Leyi (RON); Rus Rublesi (RUB); Ruanda Frangı (RWF); Saint Helena Lirası (SHP); Samoan Talası (WST); Suudi Arabistan Riyali (SAR); Sırp Dinarı (RSD); Seyşeller Rupisi (SCR); Sierra Leone Leonesi (SLL); Singapur Doları (SGD); Solomon Adaları Doları (SBD); Somali Şilini (SOS); Güney Afrika Randı (ZAR); Güney Kore Wonu (KRW); Sri Lanka Rupisi (LKR); Sudan Lirası (SDG); Surinam Doları (SRD); Svaziland Lilangenisi (SZL); İsveç Kronu (SEK); İsviçre Frangı (CHF); Suriye Lirası (SYP); São Tomé ve Príncipe Dobrası (STN); Tayvan Doları (TWD); Tacikistan Somonisi (TJS); Tanzanya Şilini (TZS); Tayland Bahtı (THB); Tonga Pa'angası (TOP); Trinidad ve Tobago Doları (TTD); Tunus Dinarı (TND); Türk Lirası (TRY); Türkmenistan Manatı (TMT); Uganda Şilini (UGX); Ukrayna Grivnası (UAH); Birleşik Arap Emirlikleri Dirhemi (AED); Amerika Birleşik Devletleri Doları (USD); Uruguay Pezosu (UYU); Özbekistan Somu (UZS); Vanuatu Vatusu (VUV); Venezuela Bolivarı (VEF); Vietnam Dongu (VND); Batı Afrika CFA Frangı (XOF); Yemen Riyali (YER); Zambiya Kvaçası (ZMW); Zimbabve Doları (ZWL); Diğer
es: Moneda: Afgano (AFN); Lek albanés (ALL); Dinar argelino (DZD); Kwanza angoleño (AOA); Peso argentino (ARS); Dram armenio (AMD); Florín arubeño (AWG); Dólar australiano (AUD); Manat azerbaiyano (AZN); Dólar bahameño (BSD); Dinar bahreiní (BHD); Taka bangladesí (BDT); Dólar barbadense (BBD); Rublo bielorruso (BYN); Dólar beliceño (BZD); Dólar bermudeño (BMD); Ngultrum butanés (BTN); Boliviano boliviano (BOB); Marco convertible de Bosnia y Herzegovina (BAM); Pula de Botswana (BWP); Real brasileño (BRL); Libra esterlina británica (GBP); Dólar de Brunéi (BND); Lev búlgaro (BGN); Franco burundiano (BIF); Franco CFP (XPF); Riel camboyano (KHR); Dólar canadiense (CAD); Escudo caboverdiano (CVE); Franco CFA de África Central (XAF); Peso chileno (CLP); Yuan chino (CNY); Peso colombiano (COP); Franco comorense (KMF); Franco congoleño (CDF); Colón costarricense (CRC); Kuna croata (HRK); Peso cubano (CUP); Corona checa (CZK); Corona danesa (DKK); Franco yibutiano (DJF); Peso dominicano (DOP); Dólar del Caribe Oriental (XCD); Libra egipcia (EGP); Nakfa eritreo (ERN); Birr etíope (ETB); Euro (EUR); Dólar fiyiano (FJD); Dalasi gambiano (GMD); Lari georgiano (GEL); Cedi ghanés (GHS); Quetzal guatemalteco (GTQ); Franco guineano (GNF); Dólar guyanés (GYD); Gourde haitiano (HTG); Lempira hondureño (HNL); Dólar de Hong Kong (HKD); Forinto húngaro (HUF); Króna islandesa (ISK); Rupia india (INR); Rupia indonesia (IDR); Rial iraní (IRR); Dinar iraquí (IQD); Nuevo shéquel israelí (ILS); Dólar jamaicano (JMD); Yen japonés (JPY); Dinar jordano (JOD); Tenge kazajo (KZT); Chelín keniano (KES); Dinar kuwaití (KWD); Som kirguís (KGS); Kip laosiano (LAK); Libra libanesa (LBP); Loti lesothense (LSL); Dólar liberiano (LRD); Dinar libio (LYD); Pataca macaense (MOP); Dinar macedonio (MKD); Ariary malgache (MGA); Kwacha malauí (MWK); Ringgit malasio (MYR); Rufiyaa maldiva (MVR); Uguia mauritana (MRU); Rupia mauriciana (MUR); Peso mexicano (MXN); Leu moldavo (MDL); Tugrik mongol (MNT); Dirham marroquí (MAD); Metical mozambiqueño (MZN); Kyat birmano (MMK); Dólar namibio (NAD); Rupia nepalí (NPR); Dólar neozelandés (NZD); Córdoba nicaragüense (NIO); Naira nigeriano (NGN); Corona noruega (NOK); Rial omaní (OMR); Rupia pakistaní (PKR); Balboa panameño (PAB); Kina papuano (PGK); Guaraní paraguayo (PYG); Sol peruano (PEN); Peso filipino (PHP); Złoty polaco (PLN); Riyal catarí (QAR); Leu rumano (RON); Rublo ruso (RUB); Franco ruandés (RWF); Libra de Santa Elena (SHP); Tālā samoano (WST); Riyal saudí (SAR); Dinar serbio (RSD); Rupia seychellense (SCR); Leone sierraleonés (SLL); Dólar de Singapur (SGD); Dólar de las Islas Salomón (SBD); Chelín somalí (SOS); Rand sudafricano (ZAR); Won surcoreano (KRW); Rupia esrilanquesa (LKR); Libra sudanesa (SDG); Dólar surinamés (SRD); Lilangeni suazi (SZL); Corona sueca (SEK); Franco suizo (CHF); Libra siria (SYP); Dobra de Santo Tomé y Príncipe (STN); Dólar taiwanés (TWD); Somoni tayiko (TJS); Chelín tanzano (TZS); Baht tailandés (THB); Paʻanga tongano (TOP); Dólar de Trinidad y Tobago (TTD); Dinar tunecino (TND); Lira turca (TRY); Manat turcomano (TMT); Chelín ugandés (UGX); Grivnia ucraniana (UAH); Dirham de los Emiratos Árabes Unidos (AED); Dólar estadounidense (USD); Peso uruguayo (UYU); Som uzbeko (UZS); Vatu vanuatuense (VUV); Bolívar venezolano (VEF); đồng vietnamita (VND); Franco CFA de África Occidental (XOF); Rial yemení (YER); Kwacha zambiano (ZMW); Dólar zimbabuense (ZWL); Otros
pt-BR: Moeda: Afegani Afegão (AFN); Lek Albanês (ALL); Dinar Argelino (DZD); Kwanza Angolano (AOA); Peso Argentino (ARS); Dram Armênio (AMD); Florim de Aruba (AWG); Dólar Australiano (AUD); Manat do Azerbaijão (AZN); Dólar das Bahamas (BSD); Dinar do Bahrein (BHD); Taka de Bangladesh (BDT); Dólar de Barbados (BBD); Rublo Bielorrusso (BYN); Dólar de Belize (BZD); Dólar das Bermudas (BMD); Ngultrum Butanês (BTN); Boliviano da Bolívia (BOB); Marco Conversível da Bósnia e Herzegovina (BAM); Pula de Botswana (BWP); Real do Brasil (BRL); Libra Esterlina Britânica (GBP); Dólar de Brunei (BND); Lev Búlgaro (BGN); Franco Burundiano (BIF); Franco CFP (XPF); Riel Cambojano (KHR); Dólar Canadense (CAD); Escudo de Cabo Verde (CVE); Franco CFA da África Central (XAF); Peso Chileno (CLP); Yuan Chinês (CNY); Peso Colombiano (COP); Franco Comoriano (KMF); Franco Congolês (CDF); Colón Costa-riquenho (CRC); Kuna Croata (HRK); Peso Cubano (CUP); Coroa Tcheca (CZK); Coroa Dinamarquesa (DKK); Franco do Djibouti (DJF); Peso Dominicano (DOP); Dólar do Caribe Oriental (XCD); Libra Egípcia (EGP); Nakfa da Eritreia (ERN); Birr Etíope (ETB); Euro (EUR); Dólar Fijiano (FJD); Dalasi Gambiano (GMD); Lari Georgiano (GEL); Cedi Ganense (GHS); Quetzal da Guatemala (GTQ); Franco Guineense (GNF); Dólar Guianense (GYD); Gourde Haitiano (HTG); Lempira Hondurenha (HNL); Dólar de Hong Kong (HKD); Forint Húngaro (HUF); Coroa Islandesa (ISK); Rúpia Indiana (INR); Rúpia Indonésia (IDR); Rial Iraniano (IRR); Dinar Iraquiano (IQD); Novo Shekel Israelita (ILS); Dólar Jamaicano (JMD); Iene Japonês (JPY); Dinar Jordaniano (JOD); Tenge do Cazaquistão (KZT); Xelim Queniano (KES); Dinar Kuwaitiano (KWD); Som do Quirguistão (KGS); Kip Laosiano (LAK); Libra Libanesa (LBP); Loti de Lesoto (LSL); Dólar Liberiano (LRD); Dinar Líbio (LYD); Pataca Macaense (MOP); Dinar Macedônio (MKD); Ariari Malgaxe (MGA); Kwacha do Malawi (MWK); Ringgit Malaio (MYR); Rúpia Maldiviana (MVR); Ouguiya da Mauritânia (MRU); Rúpia Mauriciana (MUR); Peso Mexicano (MXN); Leu da Moldávia (MDL); Tögrög da Mongólia (MNT); Dirham Marroquino (MAD); Metical Moçambicano (MZN); Kyat de Mianmar (MMK); Dólar Namibiano (NAD); Rúpia Nepalesa (NPR); Dólar da Nova Zelândia (NZD); Córdoba Nicaraguense (NIO); Naira Nigeriana (NGN); Coroa Norueguesa (NOK); Rial de Omã (OMR); Rúpia Paquistanesa (PKR); Balboa Panamenho (PAB); Kina da Papua Nova Guiné (PGK); Guarani Paraguaio (PYG); Sol Peruano (PEN); Peso Filipino (PHP); Zloty Polonês (PLN); Rial do Qatar (QAR); Leu Romeno (RON); Rublo Russo (RUB); Franco Ruandês (RWF); Libra de Santa Helena (SHP); Tala de Samoa (WST); Rial Saudita (SAR); Dinar Sérvio (RSD); Rúpia Seichelense (SCR); Leoa de Serra Leoa (SLL); Dólar de Singapura (SGD); Dólar das Ilhas Salomão (SBD); Xelim Somali (SOS); Rand Sul-africano (ZAR); Won Sul-coreano (KRW); Rupia do Sri Lanka (LKR); Libra Sudanesa (SDG); Dólar do Suriname (SRD); Lilangeni Suazi (SZL); Coroa Sueca (SEK); Franco Suíço (CHF); Libra Síria (SYP); Dobra de São Tomé e Príncipe (STN); Dólar Taiwanês (TWD); Somoni do Tajiquistão (TJS); Xelim da Tanzânia (TZS); Baht Tailandês (THB); Pa'anga de Tonga (TOP); Dólar de Trinidad e Tobago (TTD); Dinar Tunisino (TND); Lira Turca (TRY); Manat do Turquemenistão (TMT); Xelim Ugandês (UGX); Hryvnia Ucraniana (UAH); Dirham dos Emirados Árabes Unidos (AED); Dólar dos Estados Unidos (USD); Peso Uruguaio (UYU); Som Uzbequistão (UZS); Vatu de Vanuatu (VUV); Bolívar Venezuelano (VEF); Dong Vietnamita (VND); Franco CFA da África Ocidental (XOF); Rial Iemenita (YER); Kwacha Zambiano (ZMW); Dólar do Zimbábue (ZWL); Outro
it: Valuta: Afghani afghano (AFN); Lek albanese (ALL); Dinaro algerino (DZD); Kwanza dell'Angola (AOA); Peso argentino (ARS); Dram armeno (AMD); Fiorino di Aruba (AWG); Dollaro australiano (AUD); Manat azero (AZN); Dollaro delle Bahamas (BSD); Dinaro del Bahrein (BHD); Taka del Bangladesh (BDT); Dollaro delle Barbados (BBD); Rublo bielorusso (BYN); Dollaro del Belize (BZD); Dollaro delle Bermuda (BMD); Ngultrum del Bhutan (BTN); Boliviano della Bolivia (BOB); Marco convertibile della Bosnia ed Erzegovina (BAM); Pula del Botswana (BWP); Real brasiliano (BRL); Sterlina britannica (GBP); Dollaro del Brunei (BND); Lev bulgaro (BGN); Franco burundese (BIF); Franco CFP (XPF); Riel cambogiano (KHR); Dollaro canadese (CAD); Escudo capoverdiano (CVE); Franco CFA Centrafricano (XAF); Peso cileno (CLP); Yuan cinese (CNY); Peso colombiano (COP); Franco delle Comore (KMF); Franco congolese (CDF); Colón costaricano (CRC); Kuna croata (HRK); Peso cubano (CUP); Corona ceca (CZK); Corona danese (DKK); Franco del Gibuti (DJF); Peso dominicano (DOP); Dollaro dei Caraibi orientali (XCD); Sterlina egiziana (EGP); Nakfa eritreo (ERN); Birr etiope (ETB); Euro (EUR); Dollaro delle Fiji (FJD); Dalasi gambiano (GMD); Lari georgiano (GEL); Cedi ghanese (GHS); Quetzal guatemalteco (GTQ); Franco guineano (GNF); Dollaro della Guyana (GYD); Gourde haitiano (HTG); Lempira honduregno (HNL); Dollaro di Hong Kong (HKD); Fiorino ungherese (HUF); Corona islandese (ISK); Rupia indiana (INR); Rupia indonesiana (IDR); Rial iraniano (IRR); Dinaro iracheno (IQD); Nuovo siclo israeliano (ILS); Dollaro giamaicano (JMD); Yen giapponese (JPY); Dinaro giordano (JOD); Tenge kazako (KZT); Scellino keniota (KES); Dinaro kuwaitiano (KWD); Som kirghiso (KGS); Lao Kip (LAK); Sterlina libanese (LBP); Loti del Lesoto (LSL); Dollaro liberiano (LRD); Dinaro libico (LYD); Pataca di Macao (MOP); Dinaro macedone (MKD); Ariary malgascia (MGA); Kwacha del Malawi (MWK); Ringgit malese (MYR); Rufiyaa delle Maldive (MVR); Ouguiya mauriziana (MRU); Rupia mauriziana (MUR); Peso messicano (MXN); Leu Moldavo (MDL); Tögrög mongolo (MNT); Dirham marocchino (MAD); Metico mozambicano (MZN); Kyat birmano (MMK); Dollaro namibiano (NAD); Rupia nepalese (NPR); Dollaro neozelandese (NZD); Cordova nicaraguense (NIO); Naira nigeriana (NGN); Corona norvegese (NOK); Rial dell'Oman (OMR); Rupia pakistana (PKR); Balboa panamense (PAB); Kina della Papua Nuova Guinea (PGK); Guarani paraguaiano (PYG); Sol peruviano (PEN); Peso filippino (PHP); Złoty polacco (PLN); Riyal del Qatar (QAR); Leu rumeno (RON); Rublo russo (RUB); Franco ruandese (RWF); Sterlina di Sant'Elena (SHP); Tālā samoano (WST); Rial saudita (SAR); Dinaro serbo (RSD); Rupia delle Seychelles (SCR); Leone della Sierra Leone (SLL); Dollaro di Singapore (SGD); Dollaro delle Isole Salomone (SBD); Scellino somalo (SOS); Rand sudafricano (ZAR); Won sudcoreano (KRW); Rupia dello Sri Lanka (LKR); Sterlina sudanese (SDG); Dollaro del Suriname (SRD); Lilangeni dello Swaziland (SZL); Corona svedese (SEK); Franco svizzero (CHF); Sterlina siriana (SYP); São Tomé e Principe Dobra (STN); Dollaro taiwanese (TWD); Somoni tagico (TJS); Scellino tanzaniano (TZS); Baht tailandese (THB); Pa'anga tongano (IN ALTO); Dollaro di Trinidad e Tobago (TTD); Dinaro tunisino (TND); Lira turca (TRY); Manat turkmeno (TMT); Scellino ugandese (UGX); Grivnia ucraina (UAH); Dirham degli Emirati Arabi Uniti (AED); Dollaro degli Stati Uniti (USD); Peso uruguaiano (UYU); Som uzbeko (UZS); Vatu Vanuatu (VUV); Bolivar venezuelano (VEF); đồng vietnamita (VND); Franco CFA dell'Africa occidentale (XOF); Rial yemenita (YER); Kwacha dello Zambia (ZMW); Dollaro dello Zimbabwe (ZWL); Altro
ro-RO: Monedă: Afghani din Afganistan (AFN); Lek albanez (ALL); Dinar algerian (DZD); Kwanza angolez (AOA); Peso argentinian (ARS); Dram armean (AMD); Florin din Aruba (AWG); Dolar australian (AUD); Manat din Azerbaidjan (AZN); Dolar din Bahamas (BSD); Dinar din Bahrain (BHD); Taka din Bangladesh (BDT); Dolar din Barbados (BBD); Rublă din Belarus (BYN); Dolar din Belize (BZD); Dolar din Bermuda (BMD); Ngultrum din Bhutan (BTN); Boliviano din Bolivia (BOB); Marcă convertibilă din Bosnia și Herțegovina (BAM); Pula din Botswana<b> </b>(BWP); Real brazilian (BRL); Liră sterlină britanică (GBP); Dolar din Brunei (BND); Lev bulgar (BGN); Franc burundez (BIF); Franc CFP (XPF); Riel cambodgian (KHR); Dolar canadian (CAD); Escudo din Capul Verde (CVE); Franc CFA central-african (XAF); Peso chilian (CLP); Yuan chinezesc (CNY); Peso columbian (COP); Franc comorian (KMF); Franc congolez (CDF); Colón din Costa Rica (CRC); Kuna croată (HRK); Peso cubanez (CUP); Coroană cehă (CZK); Coroană daneză (DKK); Franc din Djibouti (DJF); Peso dominican (DOP); Dolar est caraibian (XCD); Lira egipteană (EGP); Nakfa din Eritreea (ERN); Birr etiopian (ETB); Euro (EUR); Dolar fijian (FJD); Dalasi din Gambia (GMD); Lari georgian (GEL); Cedi din Ghana (GHS); Quetzal din Guatemala (GTQ); Franc guineean (GNF); Dolar guyanez (GYD); Gourde din Haiti (HTG); Lempira din Honduras (HNL); Dolar din Hong Kong (HKD); Forint maghiar (HUF); Coroană islandeză (ISK); Rupie indiană (INR); Rupie indoneziană (IDR); Rial iranian (IRR); Dinar irakian (IQD); Shekel israelian nou (ILS); Dolar jamaican (JMD); Yen japonez (JPY); Dinar iordanian (JOD); Tenge kazah (KZT); Șiling kenyan (KES); Dinar kuweitian (KWD); Som kârgâz (KGS); Kip din Lao (LAK); Lira libaneză (LBP); Loti din Lesotho (LSL); Dolar liberian (LRD); Dinar libian (LYD); Pataca din Macao (MOP); Denar macedonean (MKD); Ariary din Madagascar (MGA); Kwacha din Malawi (MWK); Ringgit malaez (MYR); Rufiyaa din Maldive (MVR); Ouguiya din Mauritania (MRU); Rupia din Mauritius (MUR); Peso mexican (MXN); Leu moldovenesc (MDL); Tögrög mongol (MNT); Dirham marocan (MAD); Metical din Mozambic (MZN); Kyat din Myanmar (MMK); Dolar namibian (NAD); Rupie nepaleză (NPR); Dolar neozeelandez (NZD); Córdoba din Nicaragua (NIO); Naira nigeriană (NGN); Coroana norvegiană (NOK); Rial omanez (OMR); Rupie pakistaneză (PKR); Balboa panameză (PAB); Kina din Papua Noua Guinee (PGK); Guarani paraguayan (PYG); Sol peruan (PEN); Peso filipinez (PHP); Zlot polonez (PLN); Rial din Qatar (QAR); Leu românesc (RON); Rublă rusă (RUB); Franc ruandez (RWF); Liră din Sfânta Elena (SHP); Tālā din Samoa (WST); Rial saudit (SAR); Dinar sârbesc (RSD); Rupie din Seychellois (SCR); Leone din Sierra Leone (SLL); Dolar din Singapore (SGD); Dolar din Insulele Solomon (SBD); Șiling somalez (SOS); Rand sud-african (ZAR); Won sud-coreean (KRW); Rupie din Sri Lanka (LKR); Liră sudaneză (SDG); Dolar surinamez (SRD); Lilangeni din Swaziland (SZL); Coroană suedeză (SEK); Franc elvețian (CHF); Liră siriană (SYP); Dobra din São Tomé și Príncipe (STN); Dolar taiwanez (TWD); Somoni din Tadjikistan (TJS); Șiling tanzanian (TZS); Baht thailandez (THB); Paʻanga tongan (TOP); Dolar din Trinidad și Tobago (TTD); Dinar tunisian (TND); Liră turcească (TRY); Manat din Turkmenistan (TMT); Șiling ugandez (UGX); Grivnia ucraineană (UAH); Dirham din Emiratele Arabe Unite (AED); Dolar american (USD); Peso uruguayan (UYU); Som din Uzbekistan (UZS); Vatu din Vanuatu (VUV); Bolívar venezuelan (VEF); Dồng vietnamez (VND); Franc CFA din Africa de Vest (XOF); Rial yemenit (YER); Kwacha zambian (ZMW); Dolar din Zimbabwe (ZWL); Altele
ko: 통화: 아프가니스탄 아프가니(AFN); 알바니아 레크(ALL); 알제리 디나르(DZD); 앙골라 콴자(AOA); 아르헨티나 페소(ARS); 아르메니아 드람(AMD); 아루바 플로린(AWG); 호주 달러(AUD); 아제르바이잔 마나트(AZN); 바하마 달러(BSD); 바레인 디나르(BHD); 방글라데시 타카(BDT); 바베이도스 달러(BBD); 벨라루스 루블(BYN); 벨리즈 달러(BZD); 버뮤다 달러(BMD); 부탄 눌트럼(BTN); 볼리비아 볼리비아노(BOB); 보스니아 헤르체고비나 컨버터블 마크(BAM); 보츠와나 풀라(BWP); 브라질 레알(BRL); 영국 파운드 스털링(GBP); 브루나이 달러(BND); 불가리아 레프(BGN); 부룬디 프랑(BIF); CFP 프랑(XPF); 캄보디아 리엘(KHR); 캐나다 달러(CAD); 카보베르데 에스쿠도(CVE); 중앙아프리카 CFA 프랑(XAF); 칠레 페소(CLP); 중국 위안(CNY); 콜롬비아 페소(COP); 코모로 프랑(KMF); 콩고 프랑(CDF); 코스타리카 콜론(CRC); 크로아티아 쿠나(HRK); 쿠바 페소(CUP); 체코 코루나(CZK); 덴마크 크로네(DKK); 지부티 프랑(DJF); 도미니카 페소(DOP); 동카리브 달러(XCD); 이집트 파운드(EGP); 에리트레아 낙파(ERN); 에티오피아 비르(ETB); 유로(EUR); 피지 달러(FJD); 감비아 달라시(GMD); 조지아 라리(GEL); 가나 세디(GHS); 과테말라 케찰(GTQ); 기니 프랑(GNF); 가이아나 달러(GYD); 아이티 구르드(HTG); 온두라스 렘피라(HNL); 홍콩 달러(HKD); 헝가리 포린트(HUF); 아이슬란드 크로나(ISK); 인도 루피(INR); 인도네시아 루피아(IDR); 이란 리알(IRR); 이라크 디나르(IQD); 이스라엘 신 셰켈(ILS); 자메이카 달러(JMD); 일본 엔(JPY); 요르단 디나르(JOD); 카자흐스탄 텡게(KZT); 케냐 실링(KES); 쿠웨이트 디나르(KWD); 키르기스스탄 솜(KGS); 라오스 킵(LAK); 레바논 파운드(LBP); 레소토 로티(LSL); 라이베리아 달러(LRD); 리비아 디나르(LYD); 마카오 파타카(MOP); 마케도니아 디나르(MKD); 마다가스카르 아리아리(MGA); 말라위 콰차(MWK); 말레이시아 링깃(MYR); 몰디브 루피야(MVR); 모리타니 우기야(MRU); 모리셔스 루피(MUR); 멕시코 페소(MXN); 몰도바 레우(MDL); 몽골 투그릭(MNT); 모로코 디르함(MAD); 모잠비크 메티칼(MZN); 미얀마 차트(MMK); 나미비아 달러(NAD); 네팔 루피(NPR); 뉴질랜드 달러(NZD); 니카라과 코르도바(NIO); 나이지리아 나이라(NGN); 노르웨이 크로네(NOK); 오만 리알(OMR); 파키스탄 루피(PKR); 파나마 발보아(PAB); 파푸아뉴기니 키나(PGK); 파라과이 과라니(PYG); 페루 솔(PEN); 필리핀 페소(PHP); 폴란드 즐로티(PLN); 카타르 리얄(QAR); 루마니아 레우(RON); 러시아 루블(RUB); 르완다 프랑(RWF); 세인트헬레나 파운드(SHP); 사모아 탈라(WST); 사우디 리얄(SAR); 세르비아 디나르(RSD); 세이셸 루피(SCR); 시에라리온 리온(SLL); 싱가포르 달러(SGD); 솔로몬 제도 달러(SBD); 소말리아 실링(SOS); 남아프리카 랜드(ZAR); 대한민국 원(KRW); 스리랑카 루피(LKR); 수단 파운드(SDG); 수리남 달러(SRD); 에스와티니 릴랑게니(SZL); 스웨덴 크로나(SEK); 스위스 프랑(CHF); 시리아 파운드(SYP); 상투메 프린시페 도브라(STN); 대만 달러(TWD); 타지키스탄 소모니(TJS); 탄자니아 실링(TZS); 태국 바트(THB); 통가 팡가(TOP); 트리니다드토바고 달러(TTD); 튀니지 디나르(TND); 튀르기예 리라(TRY); 투르크메니스탄 마나트(TMT); 우간다 실링(UGX); 우크라이나 흐리브냐(UAH); 아랍에미리트 디르함(AED); 미국 달러(USD); 우루과이 페소(UYU); 우즈베키스탄 솜(UZS); 바누아투 바투(VUV); 베네수엘라 볼리바르(VEF); 베트남 동(VND); 중앙아프리카 CFA 프랑(XOF); 예멘 리알(YER); 잠비아 콰차(ZMW); 짐바브웨 달러(ZWL); 기타